

Anderson, John Products - Still Waters Revival Books























































  Loading... Please wait...




My Account
Order Status
Wish Lists
View Cart 


Sign in or Create an account













Search




Advanced Search |
					Search Tips







SWRB Home

Free Resources

Thousands of Links to Free Audio, Video and Printed ResourcesFree Puritan Books, Reformed MP3s, and Calvinist VideosPuritan Quotes, Free Reformation MP3s, Reformed Books and Calvinist Videos From PuritanDownloads.com On FaceBook

 
Shipping & Returns
 
Emails
 
Privacy Policy
 
Phone/Contact Us
 
Payment Options
 
Help
 
RSS
 
About Us
 
SWRB Sitemap














 Pastor Scott Brown, on the left in the video above, is the Director of the National Center for Family-Integrated Churches (NCFIC)




Resource Categories


 PURITAN HARD DRIVE REVIEWS

PASTOR PAUL WASHER ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR ROB VENTURA ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

DR. VODDIE BAUCHAM, JR. ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

R. C. SPROUL ON SWRB

DR. JOEL R. BEEKE ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR GREG L. PRICE ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

DR. MATTHEW MCMAHON ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR SCOTT BROWN ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR W. J. MENCAROW ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

JOAQUIN FERNANDEZ ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR DAVID SILVERSIDES ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

JOHN HENDRYX ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR KEVIN GUILLORY ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

RICHARD BENNETT ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

DR. KENNY RHODES ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

JUSTIN RAWSON ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR JAMES WALLACE ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR RICHARD GAGNON ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR JOE HAYNES ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

DR. STEVEN DILDAY ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR ANDREW COMPTON ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

TERENCE ELLARD ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR JERRY JOHNSON ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR DAVID PETRIE ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

JIM DODSON ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR BRIAN SCHWERTLEY ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PASTOR PHIL GIBSON ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

MEL R. EVERINGHAM II ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

PAUL BLYTH ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

STEVE KETTLER ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

D. M. (CALIFORNIA) ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

MICHAEL CAUGHRAN ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

WIILIAM NOPPER IV ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

LINDA THERIAULT ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

WILLIAM WARNOCK ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

ROBERT KOH ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

COMMENTS ON SWRB

WHAT'S ON THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE?

FREE PURITAN HARD DRIVE SOFTWARE

ALL PURITAN HARD DRIVE VIDEOS

PHD-ODE INSTALLATION VIDEOS

ALL PURITAN QUOTE VIDEOS

PURITAN HARD DRIVE SCREENSHOTS

PURITAN HARD DRIVE MINISTRY AND DONATION OFFERS

FREE SWRB ANDROID APP

FREE SWRB iPHONE APP

TABLE OF RESOURCE CATEGORIES

Advanced Studies

Apologetics

Assurance

Attributes and Holiness of God

Augustine

Banner of Truth

Baptism

Beginners

Bibles (Geneva, KJV, Hexapla, etc.)

Biblical Counseling

BIBLICAL HD COLLECTION

Biblical Interpretation (Hermeneutics)

Biographies and Autobiographies

Calvinism and the Sovereignty of God

CALVINISM HD COLLECTION

CALVINIST CLASSICS HD COLLECTION

Charles Spurgeon

Children's Books

CHRISTIAN EDUCATION HD COLLECTION

Christian History

Church Government

Civil Government and Resistance

CLASSIC CHRISTIAN HD COLLECTION

Classic Puritan and Reformed Sets

Commentaries

Contemporary Issues

Covenant Theology and Covenanting

COVENANTER HD COLLECTION

Covenanters and Covenanted Reformation

Creation and Creationism

Creeds, Confessions and Covenants

Cults, False Religions, Psychology, Humanism

Dealing with Affliction, Suffering, and Sickness

Debates

Dutch Reformed

Education and Home Schooling

English Puritans, Covenanters and Reformers

Family, Children, Home, and Family Worship

First Reformation

Five Points of Calvinism (TULIP)

For Pastors and Elders

For Seminary Students

FREE PURITAN & REFORMATION MP3 AUDIO SERMONS/BOOKS

FREE PURITAN BOOKS, REFORMATION MP3s, PDFs, VIDEOs

George Gillespie

God's Law, The Ten Commandments, etc.

Greg L. Price on Headcoverings

Heaven, Hell and the Final Judgment

Holy Days (Lord's Day, Christmas, Easter, etc.)

HOME SCHOOL HD COLLECTION

Intermediate Studies

John Bunyan

John Calvin

John Knox

John Owen

Jonathan Edwards

Justification

Languages, Dictionaries, Reference, etc.

LOOK WHO LOVES THE PURITAN HARD DRIVE

Lord's Supper (Communion)

Marriage, Courtship, etc.

Martin Luther and Lutheranism

Martyrs and Persecution

Other Protestant Works

Predestination and Providence

PRESBYTERIAN HD COLLECTION

Presbyterians and Presbyterianism

Prophecy, Antichrist, and Eschatology

PROTESTANT HD COLLECTION

PSALM SINGING MP3s (COMPLETE SET)

Psalters, Psalm Singing and Music

Puritan Facts

PURITAN FAST SERMONS (1640-1653) - 34 VOLS SET

Puritan Fast Sermons 1640-1653

PURITAN HARD DRIVE

Puritans and Puritanism

REFORMATION HD COLLECTION

Reformation History

Reformed and Puritan Classics

Reformed Baptist

REFORMED BAPTIST HD COLLECTION

REFORMED HD COLLECTION

REFORMED PRESBYTERIAN HD COLLECTION

Reformed Presbytery, RPNA Protesters, etc.

Reformed Theology

Reformed Worship, The Regulative Principle, etc.

Roman Catholicism, the Jesuits, Islam, etc.

Salvation and Evangelism

Samuel Rutherford

Sanctification, Prayer and Holiness

Scottish Covenanters

Scottish Presbyterianism

Scripture Song MP3s (Psalms and Bibles Verses)

Second Reformation

Separation, Unity, Uniformity, etc.

Sermons and Sermon Collections

Solemn League and Covenant

Theology and Doctrine

Third Reformation

Thomas Watson

Westminster Confession, Assembly and Divines

Authors (All A to Z)





Are You Looking For A Covenanter Church Or Are You Interested In Covenanter Worship (Along The Lines Of The Original Intent Of The Westminster Standards)? If So, Please Email Pastor Greg Price At  covpastor@gmail.com For More Information About How To Take Part In A Covenanter Service, From Your Location, Via Conference Call. Over 600 Free MP3 Sermons By Greg Price Are Also At http://www.sermonaudio.com/go/29065.





Popular Authors


Northern Presbytery Choir Puritan Divines Spurgeon, Charles Boston, Thomas Manton, Thomas Calvin, John Rutherford, Samuel Brown (of Haddington), John Knox, John Dabney, Robert Lewis


See all Authors





 Phone Orders: (780) 450-3730


















FREE Reformation and Puritan Email Newsletters. Sign Up Now!
Email:  






















To obtain free Reformation books, Puritan MP3s and Calvinistic videos, SWRB discount coupons, etc., add yourself to SWRB's Puritan and Reformed email list by using the form above.








HomeAuthorsAnderson, John








		
		Sort by:
		
Featured Items
Newest Items
Bestselling
Alphabetical: A to Z
Alphabetical: Z to A
Avg. Customer Review
Price: Low to High
Price: High to Low



Anderson, John









A Catechism, Setting Forth the Principles of Public Covenanting (1889) By John Anderson


$7.99 $1.97



 Compare 


Add To Cart






Alexander and Rufus; or a Series of Dialogues on Church Communion, in Two Parts... by John Anderson


$34.99 $1.97



 Compare 


Add To Cart






Precious Truth; Or Some Points in Gospel Doctrine Vindicated, On The Nature Of Faith, The Free Offer Of The Gospel, Assurance And Much More (1806) by John Anderson


$24.99 $0.99



 Compare 


Add To Cart






The Scripture Doctrine of the Appropriation Which is in the Nature of Saving Faith, Stated and Illustrated; in Several Discourses (1793, 1849) by John Anderson


$14.99 $0.99



 Compare 


Add To Cart






Vindiciae Cantus Dominici: Or, A Vindication of the Doctrine Taught in a Discourse on the Divine Ordinance of Singing Psalms (1793) by John Anderson


$29.99 $4.97



 Compare 


Add To Cart
















 Phone Orders: (780) 450-3730


















FREE Reformation and Puritan Email Newsletters. Sign Up Now!
Email:  






















To obtain free Reformation books, Puritan MP3s and Calvinistic videos, SWRB discount coupons, etc., add yourself to SWRB's Puritan and Reformed email list by using the form above.























































All Authors


Abernethie, Thomas Adams, Richard Adams, Thomas Alexander, Archibald Alleine, Joseph Ames, William Anderson, George Anderson, James Anderson, John Anderson, William Annesley, Samuel Anonymous Apple Arrowsmith, John Ash, Simeon Associate Presbyterian Magazine Associate Presbytery of Miami Augustine, Aurelius Bailllie, Robert Baird, Henry Balfour, William Bannerman, Douglas Bannerman, James Barker, Matthew Barnes, Albert Barrow, Reg Bates, Stewart Bates, William Baxter, Richard Bayly, Lewis Baynes, Paul Beaton, Donald Begg, James Beveridge, James Beza, Theodore Bining, Hugh Binnie, William Black, John Blaike, Alexander Blakeney, Richard P. Boettner, Loraine Bolton, Samuel Bond, John booq Boston, Thomas Bowles, Oliver Bradford, John Brainerd, Thomas Breckenridge, Robert J. Bredenhof, Wes Bridge, William Bridges, Charles Bridges, Walter Bromhall, Andrew Brooks, Thomas Brown (of Bedford), John Brown (of Edinburgh), John Brown (of Haddington), John Brown (of Wamphray), John Brown, C. J. Brown, David Brown, Henry Brown, P. Hume Brown, Thomas Bruce, Robert Buchanan, James Bullinger, Henry Bunyan, John Burgess, Anthony Burgess, Cornelius Burgon, John W. Burns, William C. Burroughs, Jeremiah Byfield, Richard Calamy, Edmund Calderwood, David Calvin, John Cameronian Cardell, John Carslaw, W. H. Carter, Thomas Carter, William Caryl, Joseph Case, Thomas Cawdrey, Daniel Chalmers, Thomas Chambers, Humphrey Chaney, James M. Charnock, Stephen Cheynell, Francis Chiniquy, Charles Chrystie, James Church of Scotland General Assembly Clarkson, Andrew Clarkson, David Close, Albert Cokayn, George Coleman, Thomas Coles, Elisha Colquhoun, John Commissioners, Scottish Conant, John Cooper, William Corbett, Edward Covenanted Ministers of Scotland Covenanted Reformed Presbyterian Publishing Covenanter Magazine Cradock, Walter Craighead, Alexander Croskery, Thomas Crumpler Cudworth, Ralph Cudworth, William Cunningham, John Cunningham, William Dabney, Robert Lewis Dale, James W. Darling, James Davies, Samuel Defoe, Daniel Dell, William Demaus, Robert Dexter, Henry Martin Dick, James Dick, John Dickinson, Jonathan Dickson, David Doolittle, Thomas Douglas, Thomas Dunlop, William Dunn, Samuel Durham, James Durye, John Edwards, Jonathan Edwards, Thomas Elgato Elliott, E. B. Ellis, John Enock, Esther Erskine, Ebenezer Erskine, Ralph Evance, Daniel Faber, George Fairbairn, Patrick Fairclough, Richard Fairley, John Ferguson, James Fisher, James Flavel, John Fleming, David Hay Fleming, Robert Forrester, Thomas Foster, J. M. Fowler, Christopher Foxcroft, John Foxe, John Fraser (of Alness), James Fulke, William Fuller, Andrew Fulton, Justin D. Gamble, David Gauden, John Gaussen, L. Gavin, Anthony George, R. J. Gibson, James Gibson, Samuel Giffin, James Gilfillan, James Gill, John Gillespie, George Gilmour, Robert Gipps, George Girardeau, John Glasgow, James Goode, William Goodwin, Thomas Gosson, Stephen Gouge, William Gower, Stanley Graham, John Graves, F. P. Greene, John Greenhill, William Guinness, H. Grattan Gurnall, William Guthrie, James Guthrie, William Hall, Archibald Hall, Henry Halliday, Thomas Halyburton, Thomas Hardwick, Humphrey Hardy, Nathaniel Harper, James Harris, Robert Harris, Thomas H. Hayward, S. Henderson, Alexander Henry, Matthew Herkless, John Herle, Charles Hetherington, William Hewison, James King Heyricke, Richard Hicks, Gaspar Higher Ground Hill, Thomas Hislop, Alexander Hodge, Charles Hodges, Thomas Hogg, James Hooker, Thomas Horton, Thomas Houston, Thomas Howie, John Hughes, George Hurst, Henry Hurst, John F. Hussey, William Hutchison, Matthew Incase Innes, Taylor James, John Angell Jameson, William Jenkyn, William Jesuits Johnson, Robert Johnston, John C. Kennedy, John Kentish, Richard Kerr, James Knox, John Kurtz, J. H. Landis, Robert Langley, John Lawson, J. R. Lee, Samuel Leighton, Alexander Ley, John Lightfoot, John Lockyer, Nicholas Logitech London Ministers Lorimer, Peter Love, Christopher Lusk, Robert Luther, Martin Lye, Thomas M'Crie, Thomas M'Donald, John M'Leod, Alexander M'Master, Gilbert M'Millan, John Jr M'Neilly, S. R. Machen, J. Gresham Mackenzie, Robert MacLean, William Macpherson, Hector Magill, George Manly, Jr., Basil Manton, Thomas Marbury, Edward Marshall, Stephen Martin, Hugh Mason, Archibald Maynard, John McCarty, Burke McFeeters, J. C. McFetridge, N. S. McKnight, W. J. McNaugher, John McWard, Robert Mede, Joseph Melville, James Mewe, William Microsoft Miller, Samuel Milligan, James Milwain, John Ministers of the General Synod of Ulster Mitchell, Alexander F. Morison, William Morris, Edward D. Murray, Matthew Nalton, James Nave, Orville J. Needler, Benjamin Ness, Christopher Nevin, Robert Newcomen, Matthew Newton, Isaac Newton, Richard Newton, Thomas Northern Presbytery Choir Oburn, William Original Covenanter Magazine Owen, John Palmer, B. M. Palmer, Herbert Parliament, English Paul, John Perne, Andrew Perrin, Jean Paul Peterkin, Alexander Peters, Hugh Pierce, James Pikering, Benjamin Pink, A. W. Platt, S. N. Pollok, Robert Pond, Enoch Poole, Matthew Powell, Vavsor Presbytery, Reformed Pressly, John T. Price, William Proffet, Nicolas Provan, Charles Puritan Divines Reformed Presbytery of Scotland Reformers, Various Reid, H. M. B. Reid, John Reyner, William Reynoldes, Edward Rice, N. L. Ridgeley, Thomas Roberts, Francis Roberts, William L. Robinson, Hastings Robinson, John Rollock, Robert Romaine, William Rutherford, Samuel Ryle, J. C. Salwey, Arthur Scipione, George C. Scot, William Scott, David Scudder, Henry Seaman, Lazarus Sedgwick, Obadiah Sedgwick, William Session Book of the Parish of Penninghame Shaw, J. W. Shedd, William G. T. Shepard, Thomas Shields, Alexander Sibbes, Richard Simpson, Robert Simpson, Sidrach Smeaton, George Smith, B. M. Smith, Peter Smith, Thomas Smith, William Speck Sproull, Thomas Spurgeon, Charles Spurstowe, William Stacy, James Stalker, James Staunton, Edmund Steele, David Steele, Richard Sterry, Peter Steven, William Stewart, Alexander Stewart, James Strickland, John Strong, William Sumner, Charles Sundry Ministers of London Swinnock, George Sylvester, Matthew Symington, Andrew Symington, William Synod of Dort Synod of the Reformed Presbyterian Church in Scotland Taylor, Francis Temple, Thomas Tesdale, Christopher Thompson, David Thompson, Elbert N. S. Thomson, James Pringle Thomson, John Thorburn, John Thornwell, James Henley Thorowgood, Thomas Todd, A. B. Toplady, Augustus Torshel, Samuel Traill, Robert Trapp, John Tuckney, Anthony Turretin, Francis Tyndale, William Valentine, Thomas Van De Velde, Abraham Various Authors Vass, L. C. Vernon, S. M. Vincent, Thomas Vines, Richard Vinke, Peter W. L. S. G. Wagner, Michael Walker, George Walker, Norman Walker, Patrick Wallace, James Ward, John Ward, Nathaniel Ward, Samuel Warren, John Watson, Thomas Welch, John Westminster Assembly Westminster Divines Whincop, John Whitaker, Jeremiah Whitaker, William White, John White, Thomas Wilkinson, Henry Williams, Daniel Willson, James M. Willson, James R. Willson, Samuel M. Wilson, Thomas Winchester, S. G. Winslow, Octavius Witherow, Thomas Witherspoon, John Withrow, W. H. Witsius, Herman Wood, James Woodcock, Francis Wycliffe, John Wylie, James A. Wylie, Samuel Young, Thomas Zanchius, Jerome









Anderson, John Products - Still Waters Revival Books
SWRB Home | About Us | Download Help | Payment Options | Privacy Policy | Shipping/Returns | Phone Orders/Contact Us | RSS 




  


  







 Phone Orders: (780) 450-3730


















FREE Reformation and Puritan Email Newsletters. Sign Up Now!
Email:  






















To obtain free Reformation books, Puritan MP3s and Calvinistic videos, SWRB discount coupons, etc., add yourself to SWRB's Puritan and Reformed email list by using the form above.




    All prices are in USD 
Most shipping from our USA facilities.
                Copyright 2017 Still Waters Revival Books.
                4710-37 A Ave NW Edmonton, Alberta, Canada T6L 3T5. Phone: (780) 450-3730.





















































New, Third-Generation Product B - Isagenix Health




























































Isagenix Health





LanguageEnglish Español









Brought to you by



Search













PrintNew, Third-Generation Product B


 

September 5, 2012 


John Anderson, pictured here in his lab, recently released the next-generation development of Product B.
The release of Product B™ Antioxidants plus Telomere Support launched Isagenix into the scientific world’s growing quest to combat aging from the inside out. It’s been more than a year and thousands worldwide have already begun to feel and show the benefits of taking Product B—increased energy, improved fitness, and a general feeling of youthfulness and vigor.
“The changes are both visible and invisible, but the biggest is that I’ve lost all semblance of age. If it weren’t for my driver’s license, I’d feel like I was 25. I have more energy, and every day I feel more and more alive,” said Peter Greenlaw, an Isagenix Associate and Product B user.
Never one to rest on his laurels, Isagenix Founder and Product B Formulator John Anderson has been working tirelessly to continually improve the efficacy of his groundbreaking, telomere-supporting formula. And now, with the newly introduced third generation of Product B at Celebration 2012, the evidence is clear that Anderson has made significant strides in the product’s ability to support telomere health.
Telomeres play a large part in healthy aging. As the protective DNA sequences at the end of each chromosome, telomeres are the difference between accelerated aging and normal, or what some would call “youthful aging.” As cells divide, the length of telomeres shorten until finally the cell can no longer divide and the signs of aging begin to appear.
“How we live—diet, exercise, stress and exposure to toxins—has a tremendous influence on the overall health and length of our telomeres,” said Anderson.
Earlier in the year, at the Isagenix Top Achievers event in April, Anderson touched on the future impact of Product B. Detailing his first visit with Bill Andrews, Ph.D.—the molecular biologist, anti-aging crusader, and Anderson’s collaborator in the testing and vetting process. Anderson recalls their conversation: “Bill said, ‘We use a control that actually turns on the gene that expresses telomerase. It’s very strong and very potent, but it’s not for human consumption.’ This answered my next question, which was why it wasn’t on the market.”
Dr. Andrews’s tests involve running Anderson’s natural ingredients through a machine that measures whether or not an ingredient produces a hit, which is the equivalent of inducing telomerase. The machine does this by comparing the test ingredients against a control that turns on telomerase activity. Unfortunately for humans, that control is too toxic for consumption.
“I wanted to have a hit as big as the control,” Anderson shared. “Bill told me it was impossible—the control was so strong we were never going to see a hit like that in a natural botanical.”
Loving a challenge, Anderson sent Dr. Andrews 80 to 160 vials every week for screening. All Dr. Andrews knew about the vials was that they differed somewhat in ingredients and potency.
Anderson’s hard work finally paid off with an exciting phone call from Dr. Andrews in early March. “You’ve exceeded our control, I can’t believe it. What are you doing over there?” Andrews said over the phone.
Visibly emotional, Anderson said he gets “goosebumps” thinking about what the third-generation of Product B will do for consumers. “For every batch, we try to improve and increase the potency and efficacy, so we get more telomere support,” he said. “What does this mean for all of you? As telomere research evolves and we discover new technologies and ways to prepare the ingredients, they’re going to make their way into the product and you’re going to reap all the amazing benefits.”
“I’m really proud that we’ve come this far. We’ve been able to prove that we can do more than scientists ever thought we’d be able to do. Isagenix is in its eleventh year of business, and I wonder what we’ll do in the next 10 to 11 years—even six months to a year from now! I tell you, its mind-boggling and I am more than excited. To me, this is the beginning of the beginning,” said Anderson.
These improvements have been shown to induce telomerase in vitro. In vitro lab results may not be indicative of in vivo results. For optimal telomere benefit, Product B is intended to be taken as part of an Isagenix System.




Related Posts



					Science Behind “Living Forever”



					Questions about Just-Launched Product B



					Study Boosts Validity of Aging Research by John Anderson & Dr. Bill Andrews



					Why John Anderson & Dr. Bill Andrews Say We Can Put the Brakes on Aging








Search





  US Legal DisclaimerPlease note that you are accessing an Isagenix webpage that contains information and claims that are specific to the United States and are only appropriate for use in that country.
Join our Facebook pageFollow us on TwitterSubscribe to RSSSubscribe to receive updates each week.  Enter your Email:      
Preview | Powered by FeedBlitz
 

 SPORTS BLOG
 ISAGENIX SCIENCE:CLINICAL RESEARCHClick here
Questions/Comments Click here to submit a question or comment on article posts.
 

Recommended Posts
Most ViewedPodcast: Bedtime Belly Buster 101 What’s the Best Way to Do a Shake Day? Do Regular Cleanse Days Work Long Term? Could Cleanse Days Help Reset Your Appetite? Intermittent Fasting: From the Ancient Greeks to Isagenix 
Isagenix Research & Science IsagenixHealth.net is your one-stop platform for learning about the science behind Isagenix products. With regular articles from our Research and Science Team and the Scientific Advisory Board, you can stay abreast of the latest evidence-based updates about weight management, healthy aging, and energy and performance. Keeping up with us is easy -- bookmark our page, subscribe via email or RSS, like our Facebook Page, or follow us on Twitter. For more information about Isagenix, visit www.isagenix.com.
 


























John Anderson Archives - Isagenix Health














































Isagenix Health





LanguageEnglish Español









Brought to you by



Search











Tag Archives: John Anderson




September 10, 2014 
Podcast: Introducing the New Product B IsaGenesis


Trainers: John Anderson, Isagenix Founder and Master Formulator, and Dr. Bill Andrews, Sierra Sciences Founder, President, and CEO



 

Think of healthy aging in terms of keeping your shoelaces from unraveling. Just like those plastic pieces ensure laces stay intact, telomeres are the protective caps at the ends of cells’ chromosomes, which protect DNA from damage. For three years, Isagenix has provided users with telomere support in the form of Product B. We’re thrilled to announce Continue reading → 





September 5, 2012 
New, Third-Generation Product B




The release of Product B™ Antioxidants plus Telomere Support launched Isagenix into the scientific world's growing quest to combat aging from the inside out. It's been more than a year and thousands worldwide have already begun to feel and show the benefits of taking Product B—increased energy, improved fitness, and a general feeling of youthfulness and vigor.

"The changes are both visible and invisible, but the biggest is that I've lost all semblance of age. If it weren’t for my driver's Continue reading → 





May 16, 2012 
Telomerase Stimulation Extends Lifespan in Mice




In a landmark study demonstrating "proof of principle" of the feasibility and safety of "slowing or turning back the clock,” Spanish researchers gave aged mice a single treatment to stimulate genetic expression of telomerase that extended health and lifespan by up to 24 percent.

These new results serve as yet more validation of research performed by Isagenix Founder John Anderson in partnership with molecular biologist Bill Andrews, Ph.D., on inducing the expression of telomerase in humans Continue reading → 





March 19, 2011 
Fusing Aging Theories: Telomere Shortening Leads to Mitochondrial Dysfunction


			

New research is adding insight and linking three theories of aging—one that suggests telomere shortening governs lifespan, and two others that suggest dysfunctional mitochondria or oxidative stress leads to aging.

At Harvard-affiliated Dana-Farber Cancer Institute, scientists have gathered data suggesting telomere shortening is the cause of mitochondrial dysfunction and diminished antioxidant defenses. Together, they decrease the body's energy and diminish organ function, both characteristic Continue reading → 





December 1, 2010 
Study Boosts Validity of Aging Research by John Anderson & Dr. Bill Andrews


			

A new study on mice published in Nature has added validation to aging research that is being performed by Bill Andrews, Ph.D., who has partnered with Isagenix Founder John Anderson to "turn back the clock" on aging.

Their approach is to screen thousands of natural product compounds a week to turn on the enzyme, telomerase, in cells to protect telomere length and reverse its loss.

Telomeres are protective sequences of repetitive non-coding DNA segments found at the end of chromosomes. Continue reading → 





  US Legal DisclaimerPlease note that you are accessing an Isagenix webpage that contains information and claims that are specific to the United States and are only appropriate for use in that country.
Join our Facebook pageFollow us on TwitterSubscribe to RSSSubscribe to receive updates each week.  Enter your Email:      
Preview | Powered by FeedBlitz
 

 SPORTS BLOG
 ISAGENIX SCIENCE:CLINICAL RESEARCHClick here
Questions/Comments Click here to submit a question or comment on article posts.
 

Recommended Posts
Most ViewedPodcast: Bedtime Belly Buster 101 What’s the Best Way to Do a Shake Day? Do Regular Cleanse Days Work Long Term? Could Cleanse Days Help Reset Your Appetite? Intermittent Fasting: From the Ancient Greeks to Isagenix 
Isagenix Research & Science IsagenixHealth.net is your one-stop platform for learning about the science behind Isagenix products. With regular articles from our Research and Science Team and the Scientific Advisory Board, you can stay abreast of the latest evidence-based updates about weight management, healthy aging, and energy and performance. Keeping up with us is easy -- bookmark our page, subscribe via email or RSS, like our Facebook Page, or follow us on Twitter. For more information about Isagenix, visit www.isagenix.com.
 







 






  Products – John Anderson
  






































John Anderson






Your cart

0
                items
              









Products




Sort by

Featured
Best Selling
Alphabetically, A-Z
Alphabetically, Z-A
Price, low to high
Price, high to low
Date, new to old
Date, old to new














Blue Anthology Shirt
        
        
          
          

$ 25.00
          
        
      










Goldmine
        
        
          
          

$ 12.00
          
        
      










John Anderson Anthology
        
        
          
          

$ 20.00
          
        
      










John Anderson Camouflage Hat
        
        
          
          

$ 25.00
          
        
      










John Anderson Praise for You
        
        
          
          

$ 12.00
          
        
      










Red Seminole Wind
        
        
          
          

$ 25.00
          
        
      










Swingin’ Shirt
        
        
          
          

$ 25.00
          
        
      










Wild And Blue Shirt
        
        
          
          

$ 25.00
          
        
      



















 
Product Search - Routledge
Product SearchResults for: author = John Anderson; range = all. Search again. 1–12 of 26 Page 1Page 2Page 3 All NewAllPublishedForthcoming Product Types FeaturedTextbooksProfessional / TradeHandbooks / CompanionsResearch MonographsMajor WorksPaperbacks Direct The Canada-US Border in the 21st CenturyIntegration, Security and IdentityBy William P. Anderson, John SutcliffeBorders are critical to the development and survival of modern states, offer security against external threats, and mark public policy and identity difference. At the same time, borders, and borderlands, are places where people, ideas, and economic goods meet and intermingle. 

The United…Hardback – 2017-10-31  RoutledgeRoutledge Advances in Regional Economics, Science and PolicyOcean InnovationBiomimetics Beneath the WavesBy Iain A. Anderson, Julian Vincent, John MontgomeryBiomimetics is the idea of creating new technologies abstracted from what we find in biology. Ocean Innovation: Biomimetics Beneath the Waves seeks that technological inspiration from the rich biodiversity of marine organisms. 
Bringing both a biological and engineering perspective to the…Hardback – 2016-06-01CRC PressBiomimetics SeriesUniform Evidence Law3rd EditionBy John AndersonThe third edition of Uniform Evidence Law: Text and Essential Cases continues the style of integrated discussion of evidence law from the earlier editions of this work resulting in a seamless synthesis and analysis of this significant area of law and practice. A critical and comparative analysis of…Paperback – 2016-04-06Federation PressRadio’s Digital DilemmaBroadcasting in the Twenty-First CenturyBy John Nathan AndersonRadio's Digital Dilemma is the first comprehensive analysis of the United States’ digital radio transition, chronicling the technological and policy development of the HD Radio broadcast standard. A story laced with anxiety, ignorance, and hubris, the evolution of HD Radio pitted the nation’s…Paperback – 2016-01-29RoutledgeRoutledge Research in Cultural and Media StudiesThe Adaptive Character of ThoughtBy John R. AndersonThis important volume examines the phenomena of cognition from an adaptive perspective. Rather than adhering to the typical practice in cognitive psychology of trying to predict behavior from a model of cognitive mechanisms, this book develops a number of models that successfully predict behavior…Paperback – 2015-11-27Psychology PressStudies in CognitionThe Mediterranean Way of EatingEvidence for Chronic Disease Prevention and Weight ManagementBy John J.B. Anderson, Marilyn C. SparlingScientific evidence accumulated over decades validates the idea that a plant-based dietary pattern, such as the traditional Mediterranean way of eating, promotes health and plays an important role in risk reduction and prevention of several chronic diseases. One of the great advantages of the…Paperback – 2015-02-25CRC PressEnglish Intercourse with Siam in the Seventeenth CenturyBy John AndersonOriginally published in 1890. This early works is a comprehensive and informative look at the subject and will appeal to any historian. Many of the earliest books, particularly those dating back to the 1900's and before, are now extremely scarce and increasingly expensive. We are republishing these…Paperback – 2014-12-23RoutledgeMemory and MindA Festschrift for Gordon H. BowerEdited by Mark A. Gluck, John R. Anderson, Stephen M. KosslynA comprehensive overview of the current state of research on memory and mind, this book captures the career and influence of Gordon H. Bower (as told by 22 of his students and colleagues), showing how Bower's research and mentoring of students has broadly and deeply affected modern research. In…Paperback – 2014-11-10Psychology PressPsychology Press Festschrift SeriesConservative Christian Politics in Russia and the United StatesDreaming of Christian nationsBy John AndersonThis book explores the politics of conservative Christian churches and social movements in Russia and the United States, focusing on their similar concerns but very different modes of political engagement.

Whilst secularisation continues to chip away at religious adherence and practice in Europe,…Hardback – 2014-10-09RoutledgeRoutledge Studies in Religion and PoliticsComputational Fluid Mechanics and Heat Transfer, Third EditionBy Richard H. Pletcher, John C. Tannehill, Dale AndersonThoroughly updated to include the latest developments in the field, this classic text on finite-difference and finite-volume computational methods maintains the fundamental concepts covered in the first edition. As an introductory text for advanced undergraduates and first-year graduate students,…Hardback – 2012-08-30CRC PressSeries in Computational and Physical Processes in Mechanics and Thermal SciencesDiet, Nutrients, and Bone HealthEdited by John J.B. Anderson, Sanford C. Garner, Philip J. KlemmerPresenting recent advancements in research findings and the resulting new schools of thought on the physiology of human bone, this comprehensive reference examines information on dietary pattern and specific nutrients in bone health. Written by experts in the areas of nutrition, bone function, and…Hardback – 2011-10-11CRC PressReligion, Democracy and DemocratizationEdited by John AndersonA new exploration of the troubled relationship between religion and democracy, focusing in on two key questions:
* how has religion engaged with the democratization processes that have taken place over the last thirty years? 
* how can it contribute towards democracy in the future?…Paperback – 2007-12-04RoutledgePage: 123Advanced SearchKeywordsTitleAuthor/EditorISBNProduct GroupanyFeaturedHandbooks / CompanionsInteractive eTextbooksLibrary / ReferenceMajor WorksPaperbacks DirectProfessional / TradeResearch MonographsSpecial Issues of JournalsStudent ReferenceTextbooksSubject CategoryanyArea StudiesArtsBehavioral SciencesBuilt EnvironmentCommunication StudiesDevelopment StudiesEconomics, Finance, Business & IndustryEducationEnvironment and SustainabilityGeographyHealth and Social CareHumanitiesInformation ScienceLanguage & LiteratureLawMedicine, Dentistry, Nursing & Allied HealthMuseum and Heritage StudiesPolitics & International RelationsReference & Information ScienceSocial SciencesSports and LeisureTourism, Hospitality and EventsUrban StudiesImprint/PublisheranyA K Peters/CRC PressAOCS PublishingAPA Planners PressASM PressAnalytic Press Anamaya PublishersApple Academic PressArchitectural PressAshgateAshgate (ex Arena)Ashgate (ex Gower)Ashgate (ex Scolar)Ashgate (ex Variorum)Ashgate Chem. Ref.Ashgate Dartmouth Ashgate VariorumAuerbach PublicationsBIOS Scientific PublishersBehavioral ScienceBirkbeck Law PressBlackwellBridge 21, USABrunner-RoutledgeCRC PressCattleDog PublishingChapman and Hall/CRCDavid Fulton Publishers  EPFL PressESI InternationalEarthscanEdition SynapseEditiones Scholasticae, GermanyErlbaum Behavioral ScienceErlbaum Psych PressEstates GazetteEuropa PublicationsEye on EducationFacet PublishingFairmont PressFederation PressFocal PressFrank CassGarland ScienceGestalt PressGower Gower (ex Ashgate) Gregg RevivalsGuilford PressHIMSS PublishingHakluyt Society IHS BRE PressInforma HealthcareInforma LawInforma Law from RoutledgeInternational Work Group for Indigenous AffairsJaypee UKKegan PaulLawrence ErlbaumLearningLund HumphriesLynne RiennerMacat LibraryMarcel DekkerMayo Clinic Scientific PressMedpharmNBSNarosaNetherlands Institute for Social ResearchNew Concept PressPan StanfordPowerhouse PublishingProductivity PressPsychology PressQMP/CRC PressRFF PressRIBARIBA PublishingRoutledgeRoutledge AcademicRoutledge IndiaRoutledge Mental HealthRoutledge-CavendishRoutledgeCurzonRoutledgeFalmerSDC PublicationsSchattauerSchlueterscheScience PublishersScolar PressSoftware & Alt MediaSpon PressStata PressStudien Verlag, AustriaSwedish Pharmaceutical PressTaylor & FrancisTeton NewMediaThe Copy WorkshopTheatre Arts BookUniversities PressWhittles PublishingPublication DateanyAllNewNew/PublishedPublishedForthcoming Search







Product  













 
 










 


 






™






PRODUCT LINES





 






Our product lines are organized around the following categories:  Rhinestone Sprays & Picks, Wedding, Prom, and Every Day/Party   By clicking on the appropriate image below, you will be directed to that specific product area.






Wedding






Rhinestone Sprays & Picks






Prom






EveryDay/Party












 


 



© 2014 Anderson Floral Products











John B. Anderson - Wikipedia






















 






John B. Anderson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the American general, see John B. Anderson (general).


John B. Anderson



1980 photo






Chairman of the House Republican Conference


In office
January 3, 1969 – January 3, 1979


Leader
Gerald Ford
John Jacob Rhodes


Preceded by
Melvin Laird


Succeeded by
Samuel L. Devine


Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th district


In office
January 3, 1961 – January 3, 1981


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen


Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin





Personal details


Born
John Bayard Anderson
(1922-02-15) February 15, 1922 (age 95)
Rockford, Illinois, U.S.


Political party
Independent (1980–present)
Republican (1956–1980)


Spouse(s)
Keke Machakos (m. 1953)


Alma mater
University of Illinois
University of Illinois College of Law
Harvard Law School


John Bayard Anderson (born February 15, 1922) is a former United States Congressman and Presidential candidate from Illinois. He was a U.S. Representative from the 16th Congressional District of Illinois for ten terms, from 1961 through 1981. Anderson was a Republican but ran as an independent candidate in the 1980 presidential election.[1][2] He has been a political reform leader, including serving 12 years as chair of the board of FairVote.



Contents


1 Early life
2 Early career
3 Political career
4 1980 Presidential campaign

4.1 Rise
4.2 Run as independent
4.3 Fall


5 Later career
6 See also
7 Bibliography
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]
Anderson was born in Rockford, Illinois, where he grew up, the son of Mabel Edna (née Ring) and E. Albin Anderson. His father was a Swedish immigrant, as were his maternal grandparents.[3][4][5][6] In his youth, he worked in his family's grocery store.[7] He graduated as the valedictorian of his class at Rockford Central High School. He graduated from the University of Illinois in 1939, and started law school, but his education was interrupted by World War II. He enlisted in the Army in 1943, and served as a staff sergeant in the U.S. Field Artillery in France and Germany until the end of the war, receiving four battle stars.[7] After the war, Anderson returned to complete his education, eventually earning a Juris Doctor (J.D.) from the University of Illinois College of Law in 1946. [8]
Early career[edit]
He was admitted to the Illinois bar the same year, and practiced law in Rockford.[citation needed] Soon after, Anderson moved east to attend Harvard Law School, obtaining a Master of Laws (LL.M.) in 1949. While at Harvard, he served on the faculty of Northeastern University School of Law in Boston. In another brief return to Rockford, Anderson practiced at the law firm Large, Reno & Zahm (now Reno & Zahm LLP). Thereafter, Anderson joined the Foreign Service. From 1952 to 1955, he served in Berlin as the Economic Reporting Officer in the Eastern Affairs Division, as an adviser on the staff of the United States High Commissioner for Germany. At the end of his tour, he left the foreign service and once again returned to the practice of law in Rockford.[9]
Political career[edit]




Anderson in 1965


Soon after his return, Anderson was approached about running for public office. In 1956, Anderson was elected State's Attorney in Winnebago County, Illinois, first winning a four-person race in the April primary by 1,330 votes and then the general election in November by 11,456 votes. After serving for one term, he was ready to leave that office when the local congressman, 28-year incumbent Leo E. Allen, announced his retirement. Anderson joined the Republican primary for Allen's 16th District seat—the real contest in this then-solidly Republican district—with four other contenders. He won first the primary (by 5,900 votes) in April and then the general election (by 45,000 votes) in November.[10] He served in the United States House of Representatives for ten terms, from 1961 to 1981.
Initially, Anderson was among the most conservative members of the Republican caucus. Three times (in 1961, 1963, and 1965) in his early terms as a Congressman, Anderson introduced a constitutional amendment to attempt to "recognize the law and authority of Jesus Christ" over the United States.[11] The bills died quietly, but came back to haunt Anderson in his presidential candidacy.[12]
As he continued to serve, the atmosphere of the 1960s weighed on Anderson and he began to re-think some of his beliefs. By the late 1960s, Anderson's positions on social issues shifted to the left, though his fiscal philosophy remained largely conservative. At the same time, he was held in high esteem by his colleagues in the House. In 1964, he won appointment to a seat on the powerful Rules Committee. In 1969, he became Chairman of the House Republican Conference, the number three position in the House Republican hierarchy in what was (at that time) the minority party.[13]
Anderson increasingly found himself at odds with conservatives in his home district and other members of the House. He was not always a faithful supporter of the Republican agenda, despite his high rank in the Republican caucus. He was very critical of the Vietnam War, and was a very controversial critic of Richard Nixon during Watergate. In 1974, despite his criticism of Nixon, he was nearly swept out by the strong anti-Republican tide in that year's election; he was re-elected with 55 percent of the vote, what would be the lowest percentage of his career. His spot as the chairman of the House Republican Committee was challenged three times after his election. And, when Gerald Ford was defeated in the 1976 Presidential campaign, Anderson lost a key ally in Washington.[14]
In late 1977, a fundamentalist television minister from Rockford, Don Lyon, announced that he would challenge Anderson in the Republican primary. It was a contentious campaign, where Lyon with his experience before the camera proved to be a formidable candidate.[15] Lyon raised a great deal of money, won backing from many conservatives in the community and party, and put quite a scare into the Anderson team. Though Anderson was a leader in the House and the campaign commanded national attention, Anderson won the primary by 16% of the vote. Anderson was aided in this campaign by strong newspaper endorsements and crossover support from independents and Democrats.[16]
1980 Presidential campaign[edit]





This article's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In 1978, Anderson formed an exploratory committee,[17] finding little public or media interest. In late April 1979, Anderson made the decision to enter the Republican primary, joining a field that included Robert Dole, John Connally, Howard Baker, Harold Stassen, George H. W. Bush and Ronald Reagan. [18]
Within the last weeks of 1979 Anderson introduced his signature campaign proposal, advocating that a 50-cent a gallon gas tax be enacted with a corresponding 50% reduction in social security taxes.[19]
Anderson built state campaigns in four targeted states—New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Illinois, and Wisconsin. He won some political support among Republicans, picking up endorsements along the way that helped legitimize him in the race. He began to build support among media elites, who appreciated his articulateness, straightforward manner, moderate positions, and his refusal to walk down the conservative path that all of the other Republicans were traveling.[20]
Rise[edit]




March 13, 1980 in Chicago Howard K. Smith (center) moderates a League of Women Voters-sponsored presidential forum featuring Anderson (far right) and fellow Republican candidates Phil Crane (far left), George H. W. Bush (second from left), and Ronald Reagan (second from right).


In the first political event of 1980, in the Republican candidates debate in Des Moines, Iowa on January 5, unlike the others, he said lowering taxes, increasing defense spending, and balancing the budget were an impossible combination. In a stirring summation,[21] Anderson invoked his father's emigration to the United States and said that we would have to make sacrifices today for a better tomorrow. For the next week, Anderson's name and face were all over the national news programs, in newspapers, and in national news magazines.[21]
Anderson spent less than $2000 in the state, but he finished with 4.3% of the vote. The television networks were covering the event, portraying Anderson to a national audience as a man of character and principle.[22] When the voters in New Hampshire went to the polls, Anderson again exceeded the expectations, finishing fourth with just under 10% of the vote.[22]
Anderson was declared the winner in both Massachusetts and Vermont by the Associated Press,[23] but in the wee hours of the morning ended up losing both primaries by an eyelash. In Massachusetts, he lost to George Bush by 0.3% and in Vermont he lost to Reagan by 690 votes. Nonetheless, Anderson was now a top-tier candidate in the Republican race and for the first time a true contender for the nomination.[24]
The next major primary for Anderson was in Illinois, his home state. He arrived there after his New England triumph and had a lead in the state polls. But his Illinois campaign struggled despite endorsements from the state's two largest newspapers. His campaign, no longer taken lightly by his opponents, was outmatched organizationally and he was ganged up upon in a candidate's debate. Reagan defeated him 48% to 37%. Anderson carried Chicago and Rockford (the state's two largest cities at the time), but he was clobbered in the southern section of the state. The next week, there was a primary in Connecticut, which (while Anderson was on the ballot) his team had chosen not to campaign actively in. While this strategy of bypassing the event had worked for him in some southern primaries, as a front runner, he no longer could pick and choose his campaigns. He finished third in Connecticut with 22% of the vote, and it seemed to most like any other loss, whether Anderson said he was competing or not. Next was Wisconsin, and this was thought to be Anderson's best chance for victory. But the bloom was off the rose by this time and he again finished third, winning 27% of the vote.[25]
Run as independent[edit]





This section's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Anderson campaign button


The Republican platform failed to endorse the Equal Rights Amendment or support extension of time for its ratification.[26] Anderson was a strong supporter of both.[27] Pollsters were finding that Anderson was much more popular across the country with all voters than he was in the Republican primary states. Without any campaigning, he was running at 22% nationally in a three-way race. Anderson’s personal aide and confidant, Tom Wartowski, encouraged him to remain in the Republican Party.[28]
Anderson faced a huge number of obstacles as a non-major party candidate: having to qualify for 51 ballots (which the major parties appeared on automatically), having to raise money to run a campaign (the major parties received close to $30 million in government money for their campaigns), having to win national coverage, having to build a campaign overnight, and having to find a suitable running mate among them. Initially, Anderson did very well as an independent. He built a new campaign team, qualified for every ballot, raised a great deal of money, and rose in the polls to as high as 26% in a Gallup poll.[29]
But the summer was cruel to Anderson. He had an overseas campaign tour to show his foreign policy credentials and it took a drubbing on national television. The major parties, particularly the Republicans, basked in the spotlight of their national conventions where Anderson was left out of the coverage. Anderson made an appearance with Ted Kennedy and it too was a huge error. By the third week of August he was in the 13–15% range in the polls.[30]
Anderson again recovered and went on a modest spree of successes. A critical issue for him was appearing in the fall presidential debates after the League of Women Voters invited him to appear due to popular interest in his candidacy, although he was only polling 12% at that time.[31] In late August, he named Patrick Lucey, the former two-term Democratic Governor of Wisconsin and Ambassador to Mexico as his running mate. Late in August, Anderson released a 317-page comprehensive platform, under the banner of the National Unity Party,[32] that was very well received. In early September, a court challenge to Federal Election Campaign Act was successful and Anderson qualified for post-election public funding. Also, Anderson submitted his petitions for his fifty-first ballot. Then, the League ruled that the polls showed that he had met the qualification threshold and said he would appear in the debates.[33]
Fall[edit]
This set off a controversy. Carter said that he would not appear on stage with Anderson, and sat out the debate, which hurt the President in the eyes of voters. Reagan and Anderson had a debate in Baltimore on September 21, 1980. Anderson did well, and polls showed he won a modest debate victory over Reagan. But Reagan, who had been portrayed by Carter throughout the campaign as something of a warmonger, proved to be a reasonable candidate and carried himself well in the debate. The debate was Anderson's big opportunity. He needed a break-out performance, but what he got was a modest victory. In the following weeks, Anderson slowly faded out of the picture with his support dropping from 16% to 10–12% in the first half of October. By the end of the month, Reagan debated Carter alone and Anderson's support continued to fade. Although Reagan would win a sizable victory, the polls showed the two major party candidates closer (Gallup's final poll was 47–44–8[34]) going into the election and it was clear that many would-be Anderson supporters were now supporting their second choice. In the end, Anderson finished with just under 7% of the vote.[35]
Most of Anderson's original support came from Rockefeller Republicans, who were more liberal than Reagan, but it bled away. Many prominent intellectuals, including All in the Family creator Norman Lear, and the editors of the liberal magazine The New Republic, also endorsed the Anderson campaign. He also had the support of many independents. Cartoonist Garry Trudeau's Doonesbury ran several strips sympathetic to the Anderson campaign.[36] According to the recently published journals of Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr., former First Lady Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis voted for Anderson, as did Schlesinger himself. Although the Carter campaign feared Anderson could be a spoiler, Anderson's campaign turned out to be "simply another option for frustrated voters who had already decided not to back Carter for another term. Polls found Anderson voters nearly as likely to list Reagan as their second choice as Carter."[37]
Anderson did not carry a single precinct in the country.[38] Anderson’s finish was still the best showing for a third party candidate since George Wallace’s 14 percent in 1968 and stands as the seventh best for any such candidate since the Civil War (trailing James B. Weaver’s 8.5 percent in 1892, Theodore Roosevelt’s 27 percent in 1912, Robert La Follette’s 17 percent in 1924, Wallace, and Ross Perot’s 19 percent and 8 percent in 1992 and 1996, respectively).[39]
He pursued Ohio's refusal to provide ballot access to the U.S. Supreme Court and won 5–4 in Anderson v. Celebrezze. His inability to make headway against the de facto two-party system as an independent in that election would later lead him to become an advocate for instant-runoff voting, helping to found FairVote in 1992.[citation needed]
Later career[edit]




Anderson speaking in 1999


By the end of the campaign, Anderson's support came mostly from college students. He capitalized on that by becoming a visiting professor at a series of universities: Stanford University, University of Southern California, Duke University, University of Illinois College of Law, Brandeis University, Bryn Mawr College, Oregon State University, University of Massachusetts Amherst, and Nova Southeastern University (his most recent post)[citation needed] and giving the lecture at the 1988 Waldo Family Lecture on International Relations at Old Dominion University.[40]
He was Chair of FairVote from 1996 to 2008 and continues to serve on its board, served as President of the World Federalist Association and on the advisory board of Public Campaign and the Electronic Privacy Information Center, and is of counsel to the Washington, DC-based law firm of Greenberg & Lieberman, LLC.[41] He was the first executive director of the Council for the National Interest, founded in 1989 by former Congressmen Paul Findley (R-IL) and Pete McCloskey (R-CA) to promote American interests in the Middle East.[42][43]
In the 2000 U.S. presidential election, he was briefly considered as possible candidate for the Reform Party nomination but instead endorsed Ralph Nader.[44] In January 2008, Anderson indicated strong support for the candidacy of fellow Illinoisan, Democratic contender Barack Obama.[45]
In 2012, he played a role in the creation of the Justice Party, a progressive, social-democratic party organized to support the candidacy of former Salt Lake City mayor Rocky Anderson (no relation) for the 2012 U.S. presidential election.[46][47]
See also[edit]

Anderson v. Celebrezze
Third party (United States)

Bibliography[edit]

Amy, Douglas J. (2002). Real Choices / New Voices (2nd ed.). New York: Columbia University Press. ISBN 0231125496. 
Bisnow, Mark (1983). Diary of a Dark Horse: The 1980 Anderson Presidential Campaign. Carbondale: Southern Illinois University Press. ISBN 0809311143. 
Mason, Jim (2011). No Holding Back: The 1980 John B. Anderson Presidential Campaign. Lanham, MD: University Press of America. ISBN 0761852263. 

References[edit]


^ "John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure". 4president.org/. Archived from the original on 2015-01-12. 
^ "About John Anderson". No Holding Back. 
^ Weaver Jr, Warren (August 26, 1980). "Anderson Chooses Lucey for his Ticket; Praises Ex-Wisconsin Governor as Qualified for the White House Seeking Broader Support Anderson Picks Lucey, Ex-Governor of Wisconsin, as Running Mate Matter of Prominence Sees Effect on Congressmen Gives Carter 'No Chance'". The New York Times. Retrieved May 6, 2010. 
^ Axelrod, David (March 6, 1980). "Wife a prime mover in the primary campaign". Chicago Tribune. 
^ Lawrence Kestenbaum. "Index to Politicians: Anderson, J". The Political Graveyard. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ [1]
^ a b 1980 campaign ad
^ "ANDERSON, John Bayard". Retrieved 18 January 2017. 
^ Mason (2011), 9–10.
^ Mason (2011), 10–14.
^ "Debate Transcript". Commission on Presidential Debates. Retrieved 2008-02-17. 
^ Mason (2011), 14–15, 234–35.
^ Mason (2011), 16-21.
^ Mason (2011), 24–27.
^ Ira Teinowitz, “Anderson-Lyon Race is Top Attraction,” Rockford Morning Star, 26 February 1978.
^ Mason (2011), 28–36.
^ campaign Jon Moore, ed., The Campaign for President: 1980 in Retrospect (Cambridge, MA: Ballinger, 1981)5
^ "From back in the pack John Anderson begins to move (July 29, 1979)". Retrieved 2017-01-18. 
^ CBS Evening News, 10 December 1979; NBC Nightly News, 13 December 1979.
^ Mason (2011), 53–119.
^ a b Mason (2011), 120–27.
^ a b Mason (2011), 133–56.
^ CBS Evening News, western edition, 4 March 1980; MacPherson, “Wow! Said John Anderson,” 6 March 1980; and Bisnow, Diary of a Dark Horse, 146.
^ Mason (2011), 158-170.
^ Mason (2011), 238.
^ Republican Party Platform of 1980, July 15, 1980. http://www.presidency.ucsb.edu
^ John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure, www.4president.org
^ Mason (2011), 264.
^ Mason (2011), 264–308.
^ "With Kennedy Aid, Carter Cuts Reagan Lead in Poll". New York Times. 19 August 1980. 
^ "Open Up the Debates: Green Party's Jill Stein Accuses Democrats & GOP of Rigging Debate Rules". Democracy Now!. August 18, 2016. 
^ Mason (2011), 352.
^ Mason (2011), 332-369.
^ "Election Polls - Accuracy Record in Presidential Elections". Gallup. 
^ Mason (2011), 366-408.
^ "Doonesbury's Timeline: 1980s". Retrieved 2015-02-16. 
^ Kornacki, Steve (April 4, 2011). "The myths that just won’t die". Salon. 
^ Mason (2011), 409, 529.
^ Tarr, Dave and Benenson, Bob; Elections A to Z, p. 632 ISBN 1506331505
^ "Waldo Family Lecture Series Digital Collection". Old Dominion University. Retrieved July 17, 2017. 
^ "Washington DC Lawyer – Washington Attorney – Patent Lawyer". Aplegal.com. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ Wa Aza, Ayoon (November 14, 2010). "How Pro-Israeli Lobbies Destroy U.S. Interests". Highbeam.com (Dar Al Hayat, International ed.). 
^ Hanely, Delinda C. (January 1, 2010). "CNI Cruises into a New Decade". Washington Report on Middle East Affairs. Highbeam.com. 
^ "Presidency 2000: Ralph Nader of Connecticut, Green Party Presidential Nominee". Politics1. Archived from the original on March 17, 2009. 
^ "Campaign digest". Seattle Times. January 7, 2008. p. A5.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Robert, Gehrke (2011-11-29). "Rocky Anderson returns – this time shooting for nation's top office". Salt Lake Tribune. Salt Lake City: Kearns-Tribune LLC. Retrieved 2011-11-29. 
^ Romboy, Dennis (November 30, 2011). "Rocky Anderson forms Justice Party, plans to run for president". Deseret News. Retrieved December 2, 2011. 


External links[edit]

United States Congress. "John B. Anderson (id: A000195)". Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. 
Appearances on C-SPAN



U.S. House of Representatives


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen
Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th congressional district
1961–1981
Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin








v
t
e


(1976 ←) United States presidential election, 1980 (→ 1984)



Republican Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Ronald Reagan


VP nominee
George H. W. Bush


Candidates
John B. Anderson
Howard Baker
George H. W. Bush
John Connally
Phil Crane
Bob Dole
Ben Fernandez
Harold Stassen





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Jimmy Carter


VP nominee
Walter Mondale


Candidates
Jerry Brown
Ted Kennedy
Ron Dellums





Independent



Candidate
John B. Anderson


VP candidate
Patrick Lucey










Other independent and third party candidates



Citizens Party



Nominee
Barry Commoner


VP nominee
LaDonna Harris





Libertarian Party



Nominee
Ed Clark


VP nominee
David Koch





Prohibition Party



Nominee
Ben Bubar


VP nominee
Earl Dodge





Socialist Party



Nominee
David McReynolds


VP nominee
Diane Drufenbrock





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee
Andrew Pulley
Alternate nominees
Richard Congress
Clifton DeBerry





Workers World Party



Nominee
Deirdre Griswold


VP nominee
Gavrielle Holmes





Independents and other candidates



Lyndon LaRouche
Maureen Smith
Running mate
Elizabeth Cervantes Barron
Warren Spannaus











Other 1980 elections
House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 7404989
LCCN: n50021916
ISNI: 0000 0000 8353 9503
GND: 120549891
SUDOC: 027716937
BNF: cb120281947 (data)
US Congress: A000195










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=John_B._Anderson&oldid=791016272"					
Categories: 1922 birthsLiving peopleHarvard Law School alumniUniversity of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign alumniBrandeis University facultyDuke University facultyUniversity of Massachusetts Amherst facultyOregon State University facultyIllinois IndependentsMembers of the Evangelical Free Church of AmericaMembers of the United States House of Representatives from IllinoisPoliticians from Rockford, IllinoisState attorneysAmerican people of Swedish descentUnited States Army soldiersUnited States presidential candidates, 198020th-century American politiciansWorld federalistsAmerican military personnel of World War IIIllinois RepublicansRepublican Party members of the United States House of RepresentativesHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using infobox officeholder with an atypical party valuePages using infobox officeholder with unknown parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2016Wikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2014All articles needing style editingWikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2011Articles with unsourced statements from February 2017Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


CatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolFrançaisNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 15:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









John B. Anderson - Wikipedia






















 






John B. Anderson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the American general, see John B. Anderson (general).


John B. Anderson



1980 photo






Chairman of the House Republican Conference


In office
January 3, 1969 – January 3, 1979


Leader
Gerald Ford
John Jacob Rhodes


Preceded by
Melvin Laird


Succeeded by
Samuel L. Devine


Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th district


In office
January 3, 1961 – January 3, 1981


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen


Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin





Personal details


Born
John Bayard Anderson
(1922-02-15) February 15, 1922 (age 95)
Rockford, Illinois, U.S.


Political party
Independent (1980–present)
Republican (1956–1980)


Spouse(s)
Keke Machakos (m. 1953)


Alma mater
University of Illinois
University of Illinois College of Law
Harvard Law School


John Bayard Anderson (born February 15, 1922) is a former United States Congressman and Presidential candidate from Illinois. He was a U.S. Representative from the 16th Congressional District of Illinois for ten terms, from 1961 through 1981. Anderson was a Republican but ran as an independent candidate in the 1980 presidential election.[1][2] He has been a political reform leader, including serving 12 years as chair of the board of FairVote.



Contents


1 Early life
2 Early career
3 Political career
4 1980 Presidential campaign

4.1 Rise
4.2 Run as independent
4.3 Fall


5 Later career
6 See also
7 Bibliography
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]
Anderson was born in Rockford, Illinois, where he grew up, the son of Mabel Edna (née Ring) and E. Albin Anderson. His father was a Swedish immigrant, as were his maternal grandparents.[3][4][5][6] In his youth, he worked in his family's grocery store.[7] He graduated as the valedictorian of his class at Rockford Central High School. He graduated from the University of Illinois in 1939, and started law school, but his education was interrupted by World War II. He enlisted in the Army in 1943, and served as a staff sergeant in the U.S. Field Artillery in France and Germany until the end of the war, receiving four battle stars.[7] After the war, Anderson returned to complete his education, eventually earning a Juris Doctor (J.D.) from the University of Illinois College of Law in 1946. [8]
Early career[edit]
He was admitted to the Illinois bar the same year, and practiced law in Rockford.[citation needed] Soon after, Anderson moved east to attend Harvard Law School, obtaining a Master of Laws (LL.M.) in 1949. While at Harvard, he served on the faculty of Northeastern University School of Law in Boston. In another brief return to Rockford, Anderson practiced at the law firm Large, Reno & Zahm (now Reno & Zahm LLP). Thereafter, Anderson joined the Foreign Service. From 1952 to 1955, he served in Berlin as the Economic Reporting Officer in the Eastern Affairs Division, as an adviser on the staff of the United States High Commissioner for Germany. At the end of his tour, he left the foreign service and once again returned to the practice of law in Rockford.[9]
Political career[edit]




Anderson in 1965


Soon after his return, Anderson was approached about running for public office. In 1956, Anderson was elected State's Attorney in Winnebago County, Illinois, first winning a four-person race in the April primary by 1,330 votes and then the general election in November by 11,456 votes. After serving for one term, he was ready to leave that office when the local congressman, 28-year incumbent Leo E. Allen, announced his retirement. Anderson joined the Republican primary for Allen's 16th District seat—the real contest in this then-solidly Republican district—with four other contenders. He won first the primary (by 5,900 votes) in April and then the general election (by 45,000 votes) in November.[10] He served in the United States House of Representatives for ten terms, from 1961 to 1981.
Initially, Anderson was among the most conservative members of the Republican caucus. Three times (in 1961, 1963, and 1965) in his early terms as a Congressman, Anderson introduced a constitutional amendment to attempt to "recognize the law and authority of Jesus Christ" over the United States.[11] The bills died quietly, but came back to haunt Anderson in his presidential candidacy.[12]
As he continued to serve, the atmosphere of the 1960s weighed on Anderson and he began to re-think some of his beliefs. By the late 1960s, Anderson's positions on social issues shifted to the left, though his fiscal philosophy remained largely conservative. At the same time, he was held in high esteem by his colleagues in the House. In 1964, he won appointment to a seat on the powerful Rules Committee. In 1969, he became Chairman of the House Republican Conference, the number three position in the House Republican hierarchy in what was (at that time) the minority party.[13]
Anderson increasingly found himself at odds with conservatives in his home district and other members of the House. He was not always a faithful supporter of the Republican agenda, despite his high rank in the Republican caucus. He was very critical of the Vietnam War, and was a very controversial critic of Richard Nixon during Watergate. In 1974, despite his criticism of Nixon, he was nearly swept out by the strong anti-Republican tide in that year's election; he was re-elected with 55 percent of the vote, what would be the lowest percentage of his career. His spot as the chairman of the House Republican Committee was challenged three times after his election. And, when Gerald Ford was defeated in the 1976 Presidential campaign, Anderson lost a key ally in Washington.[14]
In late 1977, a fundamentalist television minister from Rockford, Don Lyon, announced that he would challenge Anderson in the Republican primary. It was a contentious campaign, where Lyon with his experience before the camera proved to be a formidable candidate.[15] Lyon raised a great deal of money, won backing from many conservatives in the community and party, and put quite a scare into the Anderson team. Though Anderson was a leader in the House and the campaign commanded national attention, Anderson won the primary by 16% of the vote. Anderson was aided in this campaign by strong newspaper endorsements and crossover support from independents and Democrats.[16]
1980 Presidential campaign[edit]





This article's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In 1978, Anderson formed an exploratory committee,[17] finding little public or media interest. In late April 1979, Anderson made the decision to enter the Republican primary, joining a field that included Robert Dole, John Connally, Howard Baker, Harold Stassen, George H. W. Bush and Ronald Reagan. [18]
Within the last weeks of 1979 Anderson introduced his signature campaign proposal, advocating that a 50-cent a gallon gas tax be enacted with a corresponding 50% reduction in social security taxes.[19]
Anderson built state campaigns in four targeted states—New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Illinois, and Wisconsin. He won some political support among Republicans, picking up endorsements along the way that helped legitimize him in the race. He began to build support among media elites, who appreciated his articulateness, straightforward manner, moderate positions, and his refusal to walk down the conservative path that all of the other Republicans were traveling.[20]
Rise[edit]




March 13, 1980 in Chicago Howard K. Smith (center) moderates a League of Women Voters-sponsored presidential forum featuring Anderson (far right) and fellow Republican candidates Phil Crane (far left), George H. W. Bush (second from left), and Ronald Reagan (second from right).


In the first political event of 1980, in the Republican candidates debate in Des Moines, Iowa on January 5, unlike the others, he said lowering taxes, increasing defense spending, and balancing the budget were an impossible combination. In a stirring summation,[21] Anderson invoked his father's emigration to the United States and said that we would have to make sacrifices today for a better tomorrow. For the next week, Anderson's name and face were all over the national news programs, in newspapers, and in national news magazines.[21]
Anderson spent less than $2000 in the state, but he finished with 4.3% of the vote. The television networks were covering the event, portraying Anderson to a national audience as a man of character and principle.[22] When the voters in New Hampshire went to the polls, Anderson again exceeded the expectations, finishing fourth with just under 10% of the vote.[22]
Anderson was declared the winner in both Massachusetts and Vermont by the Associated Press,[23] but in the wee hours of the morning ended up losing both primaries by an eyelash. In Massachusetts, he lost to George Bush by 0.3% and in Vermont he lost to Reagan by 690 votes. Nonetheless, Anderson was now a top-tier candidate in the Republican race and for the first time a true contender for the nomination.[24]
The next major primary for Anderson was in Illinois, his home state. He arrived there after his New England triumph and had a lead in the state polls. But his Illinois campaign struggled despite endorsements from the state's two largest newspapers. His campaign, no longer taken lightly by his opponents, was outmatched organizationally and he was ganged up upon in a candidate's debate. Reagan defeated him 48% to 37%. Anderson carried Chicago and Rockford (the state's two largest cities at the time), but he was clobbered in the southern section of the state. The next week, there was a primary in Connecticut, which (while Anderson was on the ballot) his team had chosen not to campaign actively in. While this strategy of bypassing the event had worked for him in some southern primaries, as a front runner, he no longer could pick and choose his campaigns. He finished third in Connecticut with 22% of the vote, and it seemed to most like any other loss, whether Anderson said he was competing or not. Next was Wisconsin, and this was thought to be Anderson's best chance for victory. But the bloom was off the rose by this time and he again finished third, winning 27% of the vote.[25]
Run as independent[edit]





This section's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Anderson campaign button


The Republican platform failed to endorse the Equal Rights Amendment or support extension of time for its ratification.[26] Anderson was a strong supporter of both.[27] Pollsters were finding that Anderson was much more popular across the country with all voters than he was in the Republican primary states. Without any campaigning, he was running at 22% nationally in a three-way race. Anderson’s personal aide and confidant, Tom Wartowski, encouraged him to remain in the Republican Party.[28]
Anderson faced a huge number of obstacles as a non-major party candidate: having to qualify for 51 ballots (which the major parties appeared on automatically), having to raise money to run a campaign (the major parties received close to $30 million in government money for their campaigns), having to win national coverage, having to build a campaign overnight, and having to find a suitable running mate among them. Initially, Anderson did very well as an independent. He built a new campaign team, qualified for every ballot, raised a great deal of money, and rose in the polls to as high as 26% in a Gallup poll.[29]
But the summer was cruel to Anderson. He had an overseas campaign tour to show his foreign policy credentials and it took a drubbing on national television. The major parties, particularly the Republicans, basked in the spotlight of their national conventions where Anderson was left out of the coverage. Anderson made an appearance with Ted Kennedy and it too was a huge error. By the third week of August he was in the 13–15% range in the polls.[30]
Anderson again recovered and went on a modest spree of successes. A critical issue for him was appearing in the fall presidential debates after the League of Women Voters invited him to appear due to popular interest in his candidacy, although he was only polling 12% at that time.[31] In late August, he named Patrick Lucey, the former two-term Democratic Governor of Wisconsin and Ambassador to Mexico as his running mate. Late in August, Anderson released a 317-page comprehensive platform, under the banner of the National Unity Party,[32] that was very well received. In early September, a court challenge to Federal Election Campaign Act was successful and Anderson qualified for post-election public funding. Also, Anderson submitted his petitions for his fifty-first ballot. Then, the League ruled that the polls showed that he had met the qualification threshold and said he would appear in the debates.[33]
Fall[edit]
This set off a controversy. Carter said that he would not appear on stage with Anderson, and sat out the debate, which hurt the President in the eyes of voters. Reagan and Anderson had a debate in Baltimore on September 21, 1980. Anderson did well, and polls showed he won a modest debate victory over Reagan. But Reagan, who had been portrayed by Carter throughout the campaign as something of a warmonger, proved to be a reasonable candidate and carried himself well in the debate. The debate was Anderson's big opportunity. He needed a break-out performance, but what he got was a modest victory. In the following weeks, Anderson slowly faded out of the picture with his support dropping from 16% to 10–12% in the first half of October. By the end of the month, Reagan debated Carter alone and Anderson's support continued to fade. Although Reagan would win a sizable victory, the polls showed the two major party candidates closer (Gallup's final poll was 47–44–8[34]) going into the election and it was clear that many would-be Anderson supporters were now supporting their second choice. In the end, Anderson finished with just under 7% of the vote.[35]
Most of Anderson's original support came from Rockefeller Republicans, who were more liberal than Reagan, but it bled away. Many prominent intellectuals, including All in the Family creator Norman Lear, and the editors of the liberal magazine The New Republic, also endorsed the Anderson campaign. He also had the support of many independents. Cartoonist Garry Trudeau's Doonesbury ran several strips sympathetic to the Anderson campaign.[36] According to the recently published journals of Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr., former First Lady Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis voted for Anderson, as did Schlesinger himself. Although the Carter campaign feared Anderson could be a spoiler, Anderson's campaign turned out to be "simply another option for frustrated voters who had already decided not to back Carter for another term. Polls found Anderson voters nearly as likely to list Reagan as their second choice as Carter."[37]
Anderson did not carry a single precinct in the country.[38] Anderson’s finish was still the best showing for a third party candidate since George Wallace’s 14 percent in 1968 and stands as the seventh best for any such candidate since the Civil War (trailing James B. Weaver’s 8.5 percent in 1892, Theodore Roosevelt’s 27 percent in 1912, Robert La Follette’s 17 percent in 1924, Wallace, and Ross Perot’s 19 percent and 8 percent in 1992 and 1996, respectively).[39]
He pursued Ohio's refusal to provide ballot access to the U.S. Supreme Court and won 5–4 in Anderson v. Celebrezze. His inability to make headway against the de facto two-party system as an independent in that election would later lead him to become an advocate for instant-runoff voting, helping to found FairVote in 1992.[citation needed]
Later career[edit]




Anderson speaking in 1999


By the end of the campaign, Anderson's support came mostly from college students. He capitalized on that by becoming a visiting professor at a series of universities: Stanford University, University of Southern California, Duke University, University of Illinois College of Law, Brandeis University, Bryn Mawr College, Oregon State University, University of Massachusetts Amherst, and Nova Southeastern University (his most recent post)[citation needed] and giving the lecture at the 1988 Waldo Family Lecture on International Relations at Old Dominion University.[40]
He was Chair of FairVote from 1996 to 2008 and continues to serve on its board, served as President of the World Federalist Association and on the advisory board of Public Campaign and the Electronic Privacy Information Center, and is of counsel to the Washington, DC-based law firm of Greenberg & Lieberman, LLC.[41] He was the first executive director of the Council for the National Interest, founded in 1989 by former Congressmen Paul Findley (R-IL) and Pete McCloskey (R-CA) to promote American interests in the Middle East.[42][43]
In the 2000 U.S. presidential election, he was briefly considered as possible candidate for the Reform Party nomination but instead endorsed Ralph Nader.[44] In January 2008, Anderson indicated strong support for the candidacy of fellow Illinoisan, Democratic contender Barack Obama.[45]
In 2012, he played a role in the creation of the Justice Party, a progressive, social-democratic party organized to support the candidacy of former Salt Lake City mayor Rocky Anderson (no relation) for the 2012 U.S. presidential election.[46][47]
See also[edit]

Anderson v. Celebrezze
Third party (United States)

Bibliography[edit]

Amy, Douglas J. (2002). Real Choices / New Voices (2nd ed.). New York: Columbia University Press. ISBN 0231125496. 
Bisnow, Mark (1983). Diary of a Dark Horse: The 1980 Anderson Presidential Campaign. Carbondale: Southern Illinois University Press. ISBN 0809311143. 
Mason, Jim (2011). No Holding Back: The 1980 John B. Anderson Presidential Campaign. Lanham, MD: University Press of America. ISBN 0761852263. 

References[edit]


^ "John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure". 4president.org/. Archived from the original on 2015-01-12. 
^ "About John Anderson". No Holding Back. 
^ Weaver Jr, Warren (August 26, 1980). "Anderson Chooses Lucey for his Ticket; Praises Ex-Wisconsin Governor as Qualified for the White House Seeking Broader Support Anderson Picks Lucey, Ex-Governor of Wisconsin, as Running Mate Matter of Prominence Sees Effect on Congressmen Gives Carter 'No Chance'". The New York Times. Retrieved May 6, 2010. 
^ Axelrod, David (March 6, 1980). "Wife a prime mover in the primary campaign". Chicago Tribune. 
^ Lawrence Kestenbaum. "Index to Politicians: Anderson, J". The Political Graveyard. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ [1]
^ a b 1980 campaign ad
^ "ANDERSON, John Bayard". Retrieved 18 January 2017. 
^ Mason (2011), 9–10.
^ Mason (2011), 10–14.
^ "Debate Transcript". Commission on Presidential Debates. Retrieved 2008-02-17. 
^ Mason (2011), 14–15, 234–35.
^ Mason (2011), 16-21.
^ Mason (2011), 24–27.
^ Ira Teinowitz, “Anderson-Lyon Race is Top Attraction,” Rockford Morning Star, 26 February 1978.
^ Mason (2011), 28–36.
^ campaign Jon Moore, ed., The Campaign for President: 1980 in Retrospect (Cambridge, MA: Ballinger, 1981)5
^ "From back in the pack John Anderson begins to move (July 29, 1979)". Retrieved 2017-01-18. 
^ CBS Evening News, 10 December 1979; NBC Nightly News, 13 December 1979.
^ Mason (2011), 53–119.
^ a b Mason (2011), 120–27.
^ a b Mason (2011), 133–56.
^ CBS Evening News, western edition, 4 March 1980; MacPherson, “Wow! Said John Anderson,” 6 March 1980; and Bisnow, Diary of a Dark Horse, 146.
^ Mason (2011), 158-170.
^ Mason (2011), 238.
^ Republican Party Platform of 1980, July 15, 1980. http://www.presidency.ucsb.edu
^ John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure, www.4president.org
^ Mason (2011), 264.
^ Mason (2011), 264–308.
^ "With Kennedy Aid, Carter Cuts Reagan Lead in Poll". New York Times. 19 August 1980. 
^ "Open Up the Debates: Green Party's Jill Stein Accuses Democrats & GOP of Rigging Debate Rules". Democracy Now!. August 18, 2016. 
^ Mason (2011), 352.
^ Mason (2011), 332-369.
^ "Election Polls - Accuracy Record in Presidential Elections". Gallup. 
^ Mason (2011), 366-408.
^ "Doonesbury's Timeline: 1980s". Retrieved 2015-02-16. 
^ Kornacki, Steve (April 4, 2011). "The myths that just won’t die". Salon. 
^ Mason (2011), 409, 529.
^ Tarr, Dave and Benenson, Bob; Elections A to Z, p. 632 ISBN 1506331505
^ "Waldo Family Lecture Series Digital Collection". Old Dominion University. Retrieved July 17, 2017. 
^ "Washington DC Lawyer – Washington Attorney – Patent Lawyer". Aplegal.com. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ Wa Aza, Ayoon (November 14, 2010). "How Pro-Israeli Lobbies Destroy U.S. Interests". Highbeam.com (Dar Al Hayat, International ed.). 
^ Hanely, Delinda C. (January 1, 2010). "CNI Cruises into a New Decade". Washington Report on Middle East Affairs. Highbeam.com. 
^ "Presidency 2000: Ralph Nader of Connecticut, Green Party Presidential Nominee". Politics1. Archived from the original on March 17, 2009. 
^ "Campaign digest". Seattle Times. January 7, 2008. p. A5.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Robert, Gehrke (2011-11-29). "Rocky Anderson returns – this time shooting for nation's top office". Salt Lake Tribune. Salt Lake City: Kearns-Tribune LLC. Retrieved 2011-11-29. 
^ Romboy, Dennis (November 30, 2011). "Rocky Anderson forms Justice Party, plans to run for president". Deseret News. Retrieved December 2, 2011. 


External links[edit]

United States Congress. "John B. Anderson (id: A000195)". Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. 
Appearances on C-SPAN



U.S. House of Representatives


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen
Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th congressional district
1961–1981
Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin








v
t
e


(1976 ←) United States presidential election, 1980 (→ 1984)



Republican Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Ronald Reagan


VP nominee
George H. W. Bush


Candidates
John B. Anderson
Howard Baker
George H. W. Bush
John Connally
Phil Crane
Bob Dole
Ben Fernandez
Harold Stassen





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Jimmy Carter


VP nominee
Walter Mondale


Candidates
Jerry Brown
Ted Kennedy
Ron Dellums





Independent



Candidate
John B. Anderson


VP candidate
Patrick Lucey










Other independent and third party candidates



Citizens Party



Nominee
Barry Commoner


VP nominee
LaDonna Harris





Libertarian Party



Nominee
Ed Clark


VP nominee
David Koch





Prohibition Party



Nominee
Ben Bubar


VP nominee
Earl Dodge





Socialist Party



Nominee
David McReynolds


VP nominee
Diane Drufenbrock





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee
Andrew Pulley
Alternate nominees
Richard Congress
Clifton DeBerry





Workers World Party



Nominee
Deirdre Griswold


VP nominee
Gavrielle Holmes





Independents and other candidates



Lyndon LaRouche
Maureen Smith
Running mate
Elizabeth Cervantes Barron
Warren Spannaus











Other 1980 elections
House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 7404989
LCCN: n50021916
ISNI: 0000 0000 8353 9503
GND: 120549891
SUDOC: 027716937
BNF: cb120281947 (data)
US Congress: A000195










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=John_B._Anderson&oldid=791016272"					
Categories: 1922 birthsLiving peopleHarvard Law School alumniUniversity of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign alumniBrandeis University facultyDuke University facultyUniversity of Massachusetts Amherst facultyOregon State University facultyIllinois IndependentsMembers of the Evangelical Free Church of AmericaMembers of the United States House of Representatives from IllinoisPoliticians from Rockford, IllinoisState attorneysAmerican people of Swedish descentUnited States Army soldiersUnited States presidential candidates, 198020th-century American politiciansWorld federalistsAmerican military personnel of World War IIIllinois RepublicansRepublican Party members of the United States House of RepresentativesHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using infobox officeholder with an atypical party valuePages using infobox officeholder with unknown parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2016Wikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2014All articles needing style editingWikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2011Articles with unsourced statements from February 2017Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


CatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolFrançaisNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 15:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









John B. Anderson - Wikipedia






















 






John B. Anderson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the American general, see John B. Anderson (general).


John B. Anderson



1980 photo






Chairman of the House Republican Conference


In office
January 3, 1969 – January 3, 1979


Leader
Gerald Ford
John Jacob Rhodes


Preceded by
Melvin Laird


Succeeded by
Samuel L. Devine


Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th district


In office
January 3, 1961 – January 3, 1981


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen


Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin





Personal details


Born
John Bayard Anderson
(1922-02-15) February 15, 1922 (age 95)
Rockford, Illinois, U.S.


Political party
Independent (1980–present)
Republican (1956–1980)


Spouse(s)
Keke Machakos (m. 1953)


Alma mater
University of Illinois
University of Illinois College of Law
Harvard Law School


John Bayard Anderson (born February 15, 1922) is a former United States Congressman and Presidential candidate from Illinois. He was a U.S. Representative from the 16th Congressional District of Illinois for ten terms, from 1961 through 1981. Anderson was a Republican but ran as an independent candidate in the 1980 presidential election.[1][2] He has been a political reform leader, including serving 12 years as chair of the board of FairVote.



Contents


1 Early life
2 Early career
3 Political career
4 1980 Presidential campaign

4.1 Rise
4.2 Run as independent
4.3 Fall


5 Later career
6 See also
7 Bibliography
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]
Anderson was born in Rockford, Illinois, where he grew up, the son of Mabel Edna (née Ring) and E. Albin Anderson. His father was a Swedish immigrant, as were his maternal grandparents.[3][4][5][6] In his youth, he worked in his family's grocery store.[7] He graduated as the valedictorian of his class at Rockford Central High School. He graduated from the University of Illinois in 1939, and started law school, but his education was interrupted by World War II. He enlisted in the Army in 1943, and served as a staff sergeant in the U.S. Field Artillery in France and Germany until the end of the war, receiving four battle stars.[7] After the war, Anderson returned to complete his education, eventually earning a Juris Doctor (J.D.) from the University of Illinois College of Law in 1946. [8]
Early career[edit]
He was admitted to the Illinois bar the same year, and practiced law in Rockford.[citation needed] Soon after, Anderson moved east to attend Harvard Law School, obtaining a Master of Laws (LL.M.) in 1949. While at Harvard, he served on the faculty of Northeastern University School of Law in Boston. In another brief return to Rockford, Anderson practiced at the law firm Large, Reno & Zahm (now Reno & Zahm LLP). Thereafter, Anderson joined the Foreign Service. From 1952 to 1955, he served in Berlin as the Economic Reporting Officer in the Eastern Affairs Division, as an adviser on the staff of the United States High Commissioner for Germany. At the end of his tour, he left the foreign service and once again returned to the practice of law in Rockford.[9]
Political career[edit]




Anderson in 1965


Soon after his return, Anderson was approached about running for public office. In 1956, Anderson was elected State's Attorney in Winnebago County, Illinois, first winning a four-person race in the April primary by 1,330 votes and then the general election in November by 11,456 votes. After serving for one term, he was ready to leave that office when the local congressman, 28-year incumbent Leo E. Allen, announced his retirement. Anderson joined the Republican primary for Allen's 16th District seat—the real contest in this then-solidly Republican district—with four other contenders. He won first the primary (by 5,900 votes) in April and then the general election (by 45,000 votes) in November.[10] He served in the United States House of Representatives for ten terms, from 1961 to 1981.
Initially, Anderson was among the most conservative members of the Republican caucus. Three times (in 1961, 1963, and 1965) in his early terms as a Congressman, Anderson introduced a constitutional amendment to attempt to "recognize the law and authority of Jesus Christ" over the United States.[11] The bills died quietly, but came back to haunt Anderson in his presidential candidacy.[12]
As he continued to serve, the atmosphere of the 1960s weighed on Anderson and he began to re-think some of his beliefs. By the late 1960s, Anderson's positions on social issues shifted to the left, though his fiscal philosophy remained largely conservative. At the same time, he was held in high esteem by his colleagues in the House. In 1964, he won appointment to a seat on the powerful Rules Committee. In 1969, he became Chairman of the House Republican Conference, the number three position in the House Republican hierarchy in what was (at that time) the minority party.[13]
Anderson increasingly found himself at odds with conservatives in his home district and other members of the House. He was not always a faithful supporter of the Republican agenda, despite his high rank in the Republican caucus. He was very critical of the Vietnam War, and was a very controversial critic of Richard Nixon during Watergate. In 1974, despite his criticism of Nixon, he was nearly swept out by the strong anti-Republican tide in that year's election; he was re-elected with 55 percent of the vote, what would be the lowest percentage of his career. His spot as the chairman of the House Republican Committee was challenged three times after his election. And, when Gerald Ford was defeated in the 1976 Presidential campaign, Anderson lost a key ally in Washington.[14]
In late 1977, a fundamentalist television minister from Rockford, Don Lyon, announced that he would challenge Anderson in the Republican primary. It was a contentious campaign, where Lyon with his experience before the camera proved to be a formidable candidate.[15] Lyon raised a great deal of money, won backing from many conservatives in the community and party, and put quite a scare into the Anderson team. Though Anderson was a leader in the House and the campaign commanded national attention, Anderson won the primary by 16% of the vote. Anderson was aided in this campaign by strong newspaper endorsements and crossover support from independents and Democrats.[16]
1980 Presidential campaign[edit]





This article's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In 1978, Anderson formed an exploratory committee,[17] finding little public or media interest. In late April 1979, Anderson made the decision to enter the Republican primary, joining a field that included Robert Dole, John Connally, Howard Baker, Harold Stassen, George H. W. Bush and Ronald Reagan. [18]
Within the last weeks of 1979 Anderson introduced his signature campaign proposal, advocating that a 50-cent a gallon gas tax be enacted with a corresponding 50% reduction in social security taxes.[19]
Anderson built state campaigns in four targeted states—New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Illinois, and Wisconsin. He won some political support among Republicans, picking up endorsements along the way that helped legitimize him in the race. He began to build support among media elites, who appreciated his articulateness, straightforward manner, moderate positions, and his refusal to walk down the conservative path that all of the other Republicans were traveling.[20]
Rise[edit]




March 13, 1980 in Chicago Howard K. Smith (center) moderates a League of Women Voters-sponsored presidential forum featuring Anderson (far right) and fellow Republican candidates Phil Crane (far left), George H. W. Bush (second from left), and Ronald Reagan (second from right).


In the first political event of 1980, in the Republican candidates debate in Des Moines, Iowa on January 5, unlike the others, he said lowering taxes, increasing defense spending, and balancing the budget were an impossible combination. In a stirring summation,[21] Anderson invoked his father's emigration to the United States and said that we would have to make sacrifices today for a better tomorrow. For the next week, Anderson's name and face were all over the national news programs, in newspapers, and in national news magazines.[21]
Anderson spent less than $2000 in the state, but he finished with 4.3% of the vote. The television networks were covering the event, portraying Anderson to a national audience as a man of character and principle.[22] When the voters in New Hampshire went to the polls, Anderson again exceeded the expectations, finishing fourth with just under 10% of the vote.[22]
Anderson was declared the winner in both Massachusetts and Vermont by the Associated Press,[23] but in the wee hours of the morning ended up losing both primaries by an eyelash. In Massachusetts, he lost to George Bush by 0.3% and in Vermont he lost to Reagan by 690 votes. Nonetheless, Anderson was now a top-tier candidate in the Republican race and for the first time a true contender for the nomination.[24]
The next major primary for Anderson was in Illinois, his home state. He arrived there after his New England triumph and had a lead in the state polls. But his Illinois campaign struggled despite endorsements from the state's two largest newspapers. His campaign, no longer taken lightly by his opponents, was outmatched organizationally and he was ganged up upon in a candidate's debate. Reagan defeated him 48% to 37%. Anderson carried Chicago and Rockford (the state's two largest cities at the time), but he was clobbered in the southern section of the state. The next week, there was a primary in Connecticut, which (while Anderson was on the ballot) his team had chosen not to campaign actively in. While this strategy of bypassing the event had worked for him in some southern primaries, as a front runner, he no longer could pick and choose his campaigns. He finished third in Connecticut with 22% of the vote, and it seemed to most like any other loss, whether Anderson said he was competing or not. Next was Wisconsin, and this was thought to be Anderson's best chance for victory. But the bloom was off the rose by this time and he again finished third, winning 27% of the vote.[25]
Run as independent[edit]





This section's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Anderson campaign button


The Republican platform failed to endorse the Equal Rights Amendment or support extension of time for its ratification.[26] Anderson was a strong supporter of both.[27] Pollsters were finding that Anderson was much more popular across the country with all voters than he was in the Republican primary states. Without any campaigning, he was running at 22% nationally in a three-way race. Anderson’s personal aide and confidant, Tom Wartowski, encouraged him to remain in the Republican Party.[28]
Anderson faced a huge number of obstacles as a non-major party candidate: having to qualify for 51 ballots (which the major parties appeared on automatically), having to raise money to run a campaign (the major parties received close to $30 million in government money for their campaigns), having to win national coverage, having to build a campaign overnight, and having to find a suitable running mate among them. Initially, Anderson did very well as an independent. He built a new campaign team, qualified for every ballot, raised a great deal of money, and rose in the polls to as high as 26% in a Gallup poll.[29]
But the summer was cruel to Anderson. He had an overseas campaign tour to show his foreign policy credentials and it took a drubbing on national television. The major parties, particularly the Republicans, basked in the spotlight of their national conventions where Anderson was left out of the coverage. Anderson made an appearance with Ted Kennedy and it too was a huge error. By the third week of August he was in the 13–15% range in the polls.[30]
Anderson again recovered and went on a modest spree of successes. A critical issue for him was appearing in the fall presidential debates after the League of Women Voters invited him to appear due to popular interest in his candidacy, although he was only polling 12% at that time.[31] In late August, he named Patrick Lucey, the former two-term Democratic Governor of Wisconsin and Ambassador to Mexico as his running mate. Late in August, Anderson released a 317-page comprehensive platform, under the banner of the National Unity Party,[32] that was very well received. In early September, a court challenge to Federal Election Campaign Act was successful and Anderson qualified for post-election public funding. Also, Anderson submitted his petitions for his fifty-first ballot. Then, the League ruled that the polls showed that he had met the qualification threshold and said he would appear in the debates.[33]
Fall[edit]
This set off a controversy. Carter said that he would not appear on stage with Anderson, and sat out the debate, which hurt the President in the eyes of voters. Reagan and Anderson had a debate in Baltimore on September 21, 1980. Anderson did well, and polls showed he won a modest debate victory over Reagan. But Reagan, who had been portrayed by Carter throughout the campaign as something of a warmonger, proved to be a reasonable candidate and carried himself well in the debate. The debate was Anderson's big opportunity. He needed a break-out performance, but what he got was a modest victory. In the following weeks, Anderson slowly faded out of the picture with his support dropping from 16% to 10–12% in the first half of October. By the end of the month, Reagan debated Carter alone and Anderson's support continued to fade. Although Reagan would win a sizable victory, the polls showed the two major party candidates closer (Gallup's final poll was 47–44–8[34]) going into the election and it was clear that many would-be Anderson supporters were now supporting their second choice. In the end, Anderson finished with just under 7% of the vote.[35]
Most of Anderson's original support came from Rockefeller Republicans, who were more liberal than Reagan, but it bled away. Many prominent intellectuals, including All in the Family creator Norman Lear, and the editors of the liberal magazine The New Republic, also endorsed the Anderson campaign. He also had the support of many independents. Cartoonist Garry Trudeau's Doonesbury ran several strips sympathetic to the Anderson campaign.[36] According to the recently published journals of Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr., former First Lady Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis voted for Anderson, as did Schlesinger himself. Although the Carter campaign feared Anderson could be a spoiler, Anderson's campaign turned out to be "simply another option for frustrated voters who had already decided not to back Carter for another term. Polls found Anderson voters nearly as likely to list Reagan as their second choice as Carter."[37]
Anderson did not carry a single precinct in the country.[38] Anderson’s finish was still the best showing for a third party candidate since George Wallace’s 14 percent in 1968 and stands as the seventh best for any such candidate since the Civil War (trailing James B. Weaver’s 8.5 percent in 1892, Theodore Roosevelt’s 27 percent in 1912, Robert La Follette’s 17 percent in 1924, Wallace, and Ross Perot’s 19 percent and 8 percent in 1992 and 1996, respectively).[39]
He pursued Ohio's refusal to provide ballot access to the U.S. Supreme Court and won 5–4 in Anderson v. Celebrezze. His inability to make headway against the de facto two-party system as an independent in that election would later lead him to become an advocate for instant-runoff voting, helping to found FairVote in 1992.[citation needed]
Later career[edit]




Anderson speaking in 1999


By the end of the campaign, Anderson's support came mostly from college students. He capitalized on that by becoming a visiting professor at a series of universities: Stanford University, University of Southern California, Duke University, University of Illinois College of Law, Brandeis University, Bryn Mawr College, Oregon State University, University of Massachusetts Amherst, and Nova Southeastern University (his most recent post)[citation needed] and giving the lecture at the 1988 Waldo Family Lecture on International Relations at Old Dominion University.[40]
He was Chair of FairVote from 1996 to 2008 and continues to serve on its board, served as President of the World Federalist Association and on the advisory board of Public Campaign and the Electronic Privacy Information Center, and is of counsel to the Washington, DC-based law firm of Greenberg & Lieberman, LLC.[41] He was the first executive director of the Council for the National Interest, founded in 1989 by former Congressmen Paul Findley (R-IL) and Pete McCloskey (R-CA) to promote American interests in the Middle East.[42][43]
In the 2000 U.S. presidential election, he was briefly considered as possible candidate for the Reform Party nomination but instead endorsed Ralph Nader.[44] In January 2008, Anderson indicated strong support for the candidacy of fellow Illinoisan, Democratic contender Barack Obama.[45]
In 2012, he played a role in the creation of the Justice Party, a progressive, social-democratic party organized to support the candidacy of former Salt Lake City mayor Rocky Anderson (no relation) for the 2012 U.S. presidential election.[46][47]
See also[edit]

Anderson v. Celebrezze
Third party (United States)

Bibliography[edit]

Amy, Douglas J. (2002). Real Choices / New Voices (2nd ed.). New York: Columbia University Press. ISBN 0231125496. 
Bisnow, Mark (1983). Diary of a Dark Horse: The 1980 Anderson Presidential Campaign. Carbondale: Southern Illinois University Press. ISBN 0809311143. 
Mason, Jim (2011). No Holding Back: The 1980 John B. Anderson Presidential Campaign. Lanham, MD: University Press of America. ISBN 0761852263. 

References[edit]


^ "John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure". 4president.org/. Archived from the original on 2015-01-12. 
^ "About John Anderson". No Holding Back. 
^ Weaver Jr, Warren (August 26, 1980). "Anderson Chooses Lucey for his Ticket; Praises Ex-Wisconsin Governor as Qualified for the White House Seeking Broader Support Anderson Picks Lucey, Ex-Governor of Wisconsin, as Running Mate Matter of Prominence Sees Effect on Congressmen Gives Carter 'No Chance'". The New York Times. Retrieved May 6, 2010. 
^ Axelrod, David (March 6, 1980). "Wife a prime mover in the primary campaign". Chicago Tribune. 
^ Lawrence Kestenbaum. "Index to Politicians: Anderson, J". The Political Graveyard. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ [1]
^ a b 1980 campaign ad
^ "ANDERSON, John Bayard". Retrieved 18 January 2017. 
^ Mason (2011), 9–10.
^ Mason (2011), 10–14.
^ "Debate Transcript". Commission on Presidential Debates. Retrieved 2008-02-17. 
^ Mason (2011), 14–15, 234–35.
^ Mason (2011), 16-21.
^ Mason (2011), 24–27.
^ Ira Teinowitz, “Anderson-Lyon Race is Top Attraction,” Rockford Morning Star, 26 February 1978.
^ Mason (2011), 28–36.
^ campaign Jon Moore, ed., The Campaign for President: 1980 in Retrospect (Cambridge, MA: Ballinger, 1981)5
^ "From back in the pack John Anderson begins to move (July 29, 1979)". Retrieved 2017-01-18. 
^ CBS Evening News, 10 December 1979; NBC Nightly News, 13 December 1979.
^ Mason (2011), 53–119.
^ a b Mason (2011), 120–27.
^ a b Mason (2011), 133–56.
^ CBS Evening News, western edition, 4 March 1980; MacPherson, “Wow! Said John Anderson,” 6 March 1980; and Bisnow, Diary of a Dark Horse, 146.
^ Mason (2011), 158-170.
^ Mason (2011), 238.
^ Republican Party Platform of 1980, July 15, 1980. http://www.presidency.ucsb.edu
^ John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure, www.4president.org
^ Mason (2011), 264.
^ Mason (2011), 264–308.
^ "With Kennedy Aid, Carter Cuts Reagan Lead in Poll". New York Times. 19 August 1980. 
^ "Open Up the Debates: Green Party's Jill Stein Accuses Democrats & GOP of Rigging Debate Rules". Democracy Now!. August 18, 2016. 
^ Mason (2011), 352.
^ Mason (2011), 332-369.
^ "Election Polls - Accuracy Record in Presidential Elections". Gallup. 
^ Mason (2011), 366-408.
^ "Doonesbury's Timeline: 1980s". Retrieved 2015-02-16. 
^ Kornacki, Steve (April 4, 2011). "The myths that just won’t die". Salon. 
^ Mason (2011), 409, 529.
^ Tarr, Dave and Benenson, Bob; Elections A to Z, p. 632 ISBN 1506331505
^ "Waldo Family Lecture Series Digital Collection". Old Dominion University. Retrieved July 17, 2017. 
^ "Washington DC Lawyer – Washington Attorney – Patent Lawyer". Aplegal.com. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ Wa Aza, Ayoon (November 14, 2010). "How Pro-Israeli Lobbies Destroy U.S. Interests". Highbeam.com (Dar Al Hayat, International ed.). 
^ Hanely, Delinda C. (January 1, 2010). "CNI Cruises into a New Decade". Washington Report on Middle East Affairs. Highbeam.com. 
^ "Presidency 2000: Ralph Nader of Connecticut, Green Party Presidential Nominee". Politics1. Archived from the original on March 17, 2009. 
^ "Campaign digest". Seattle Times. January 7, 2008. p. A5.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Robert, Gehrke (2011-11-29). "Rocky Anderson returns – this time shooting for nation's top office". Salt Lake Tribune. Salt Lake City: Kearns-Tribune LLC. Retrieved 2011-11-29. 
^ Romboy, Dennis (November 30, 2011). "Rocky Anderson forms Justice Party, plans to run for president". Deseret News. Retrieved December 2, 2011. 


External links[edit]

United States Congress. "John B. Anderson (id: A000195)". Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. 
Appearances on C-SPAN



U.S. House of Representatives


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen
Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th congressional district
1961–1981
Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin








v
t
e


(1976 ←) United States presidential election, 1980 (→ 1984)



Republican Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Ronald Reagan


VP nominee
George H. W. Bush


Candidates
John B. Anderson
Howard Baker
George H. W. Bush
John Connally
Phil Crane
Bob Dole
Ben Fernandez
Harold Stassen





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Jimmy Carter


VP nominee
Walter Mondale


Candidates
Jerry Brown
Ted Kennedy
Ron Dellums





Independent



Candidate
John B. Anderson


VP candidate
Patrick Lucey










Other independent and third party candidates



Citizens Party



Nominee
Barry Commoner


VP nominee
LaDonna Harris





Libertarian Party



Nominee
Ed Clark


VP nominee
David Koch





Prohibition Party



Nominee
Ben Bubar


VP nominee
Earl Dodge





Socialist Party



Nominee
David McReynolds


VP nominee
Diane Drufenbrock





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee
Andrew Pulley
Alternate nominees
Richard Congress
Clifton DeBerry





Workers World Party



Nominee
Deirdre Griswold


VP nominee
Gavrielle Holmes





Independents and other candidates



Lyndon LaRouche
Maureen Smith
Running mate
Elizabeth Cervantes Barron
Warren Spannaus











Other 1980 elections
House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 7404989
LCCN: n50021916
ISNI: 0000 0000 8353 9503
GND: 120549891
SUDOC: 027716937
BNF: cb120281947 (data)
US Congress: A000195










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=John_B._Anderson&oldid=791016272"					
Categories: 1922 birthsLiving peopleHarvard Law School alumniUniversity of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign alumniBrandeis University facultyDuke University facultyUniversity of Massachusetts Amherst facultyOregon State University facultyIllinois IndependentsMembers of the Evangelical Free Church of AmericaMembers of the United States House of Representatives from IllinoisPoliticians from Rockford, IllinoisState attorneysAmerican people of Swedish descentUnited States Army soldiersUnited States presidential candidates, 198020th-century American politiciansWorld federalistsAmerican military personnel of World War IIIllinois RepublicansRepublican Party members of the United States House of RepresentativesHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using infobox officeholder with an atypical party valuePages using infobox officeholder with unknown parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2016Wikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2014All articles needing style editingWikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2011Articles with unsourced statements from February 2017Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


CatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolFrançaisNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 15:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









John B. Anderson - Wikipedia






















 






John B. Anderson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the American general, see John B. Anderson (general).


John B. Anderson



1980 photo






Chairman of the House Republican Conference


In office
January 3, 1969 – January 3, 1979


Leader
Gerald Ford
John Jacob Rhodes


Preceded by
Melvin Laird


Succeeded by
Samuel L. Devine


Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th district


In office
January 3, 1961 – January 3, 1981


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen


Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin





Personal details


Born
John Bayard Anderson
(1922-02-15) February 15, 1922 (age 95)
Rockford, Illinois, U.S.


Political party
Independent (1980–present)
Republican (1956–1980)


Spouse(s)
Keke Machakos (m. 1953)


Alma mater
University of Illinois
University of Illinois College of Law
Harvard Law School


John Bayard Anderson (born February 15, 1922) is a former United States Congressman and Presidential candidate from Illinois. He was a U.S. Representative from the 16th Congressional District of Illinois for ten terms, from 1961 through 1981. Anderson was a Republican but ran as an independent candidate in the 1980 presidential election.[1][2] He has been a political reform leader, including serving 12 years as chair of the board of FairVote.



Contents


1 Early life
2 Early career
3 Political career
4 1980 Presidential campaign

4.1 Rise
4.2 Run as independent
4.3 Fall


5 Later career
6 See also
7 Bibliography
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]
Anderson was born in Rockford, Illinois, where he grew up, the son of Mabel Edna (née Ring) and E. Albin Anderson. His father was a Swedish immigrant, as were his maternal grandparents.[3][4][5][6] In his youth, he worked in his family's grocery store.[7] He graduated as the valedictorian of his class at Rockford Central High School. He graduated from the University of Illinois in 1939, and started law school, but his education was interrupted by World War II. He enlisted in the Army in 1943, and served as a staff sergeant in the U.S. Field Artillery in France and Germany until the end of the war, receiving four battle stars.[7] After the war, Anderson returned to complete his education, eventually earning a Juris Doctor (J.D.) from the University of Illinois College of Law in 1946. [8]
Early career[edit]
He was admitted to the Illinois bar the same year, and practiced law in Rockford.[citation needed] Soon after, Anderson moved east to attend Harvard Law School, obtaining a Master of Laws (LL.M.) in 1949. While at Harvard, he served on the faculty of Northeastern University School of Law in Boston. In another brief return to Rockford, Anderson practiced at the law firm Large, Reno & Zahm (now Reno & Zahm LLP). Thereafter, Anderson joined the Foreign Service. From 1952 to 1955, he served in Berlin as the Economic Reporting Officer in the Eastern Affairs Division, as an adviser on the staff of the United States High Commissioner for Germany. At the end of his tour, he left the foreign service and once again returned to the practice of law in Rockford.[9]
Political career[edit]




Anderson in 1965


Soon after his return, Anderson was approached about running for public office. In 1956, Anderson was elected State's Attorney in Winnebago County, Illinois, first winning a four-person race in the April primary by 1,330 votes and then the general election in November by 11,456 votes. After serving for one term, he was ready to leave that office when the local congressman, 28-year incumbent Leo E. Allen, announced his retirement. Anderson joined the Republican primary for Allen's 16th District seat—the real contest in this then-solidly Republican district—with four other contenders. He won first the primary (by 5,900 votes) in April and then the general election (by 45,000 votes) in November.[10] He served in the United States House of Representatives for ten terms, from 1961 to 1981.
Initially, Anderson was among the most conservative members of the Republican caucus. Three times (in 1961, 1963, and 1965) in his early terms as a Congressman, Anderson introduced a constitutional amendment to attempt to "recognize the law and authority of Jesus Christ" over the United States.[11] The bills died quietly, but came back to haunt Anderson in his presidential candidacy.[12]
As he continued to serve, the atmosphere of the 1960s weighed on Anderson and he began to re-think some of his beliefs. By the late 1960s, Anderson's positions on social issues shifted to the left, though his fiscal philosophy remained largely conservative. At the same time, he was held in high esteem by his colleagues in the House. In 1964, he won appointment to a seat on the powerful Rules Committee. In 1969, he became Chairman of the House Republican Conference, the number three position in the House Republican hierarchy in what was (at that time) the minority party.[13]
Anderson increasingly found himself at odds with conservatives in his home district and other members of the House. He was not always a faithful supporter of the Republican agenda, despite his high rank in the Republican caucus. He was very critical of the Vietnam War, and was a very controversial critic of Richard Nixon during Watergate. In 1974, despite his criticism of Nixon, he was nearly swept out by the strong anti-Republican tide in that year's election; he was re-elected with 55 percent of the vote, what would be the lowest percentage of his career. His spot as the chairman of the House Republican Committee was challenged three times after his election. And, when Gerald Ford was defeated in the 1976 Presidential campaign, Anderson lost a key ally in Washington.[14]
In late 1977, a fundamentalist television minister from Rockford, Don Lyon, announced that he would challenge Anderson in the Republican primary. It was a contentious campaign, where Lyon with his experience before the camera proved to be a formidable candidate.[15] Lyon raised a great deal of money, won backing from many conservatives in the community and party, and put quite a scare into the Anderson team. Though Anderson was a leader in the House and the campaign commanded national attention, Anderson won the primary by 16% of the vote. Anderson was aided in this campaign by strong newspaper endorsements and crossover support from independents and Democrats.[16]
1980 Presidential campaign[edit]





This article's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In 1978, Anderson formed an exploratory committee,[17] finding little public or media interest. In late April 1979, Anderson made the decision to enter the Republican primary, joining a field that included Robert Dole, John Connally, Howard Baker, Harold Stassen, George H. W. Bush and Ronald Reagan. [18]
Within the last weeks of 1979 Anderson introduced his signature campaign proposal, advocating that a 50-cent a gallon gas tax be enacted with a corresponding 50% reduction in social security taxes.[19]
Anderson built state campaigns in four targeted states—New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Illinois, and Wisconsin. He won some political support among Republicans, picking up endorsements along the way that helped legitimize him in the race. He began to build support among media elites, who appreciated his articulateness, straightforward manner, moderate positions, and his refusal to walk down the conservative path that all of the other Republicans were traveling.[20]
Rise[edit]




March 13, 1980 in Chicago Howard K. Smith (center) moderates a League of Women Voters-sponsored presidential forum featuring Anderson (far right) and fellow Republican candidates Phil Crane (far left), George H. W. Bush (second from left), and Ronald Reagan (second from right).


In the first political event of 1980, in the Republican candidates debate in Des Moines, Iowa on January 5, unlike the others, he said lowering taxes, increasing defense spending, and balancing the budget were an impossible combination. In a stirring summation,[21] Anderson invoked his father's emigration to the United States and said that we would have to make sacrifices today for a better tomorrow. For the next week, Anderson's name and face were all over the national news programs, in newspapers, and in national news magazines.[21]
Anderson spent less than $2000 in the state, but he finished with 4.3% of the vote. The television networks were covering the event, portraying Anderson to a national audience as a man of character and principle.[22] When the voters in New Hampshire went to the polls, Anderson again exceeded the expectations, finishing fourth with just under 10% of the vote.[22]
Anderson was declared the winner in both Massachusetts and Vermont by the Associated Press,[23] but in the wee hours of the morning ended up losing both primaries by an eyelash. In Massachusetts, he lost to George Bush by 0.3% and in Vermont he lost to Reagan by 690 votes. Nonetheless, Anderson was now a top-tier candidate in the Republican race and for the first time a true contender for the nomination.[24]
The next major primary for Anderson was in Illinois, his home state. He arrived there after his New England triumph and had a lead in the state polls. But his Illinois campaign struggled despite endorsements from the state's two largest newspapers. His campaign, no longer taken lightly by his opponents, was outmatched organizationally and he was ganged up upon in a candidate's debate. Reagan defeated him 48% to 37%. Anderson carried Chicago and Rockford (the state's two largest cities at the time), but he was clobbered in the southern section of the state. The next week, there was a primary in Connecticut, which (while Anderson was on the ballot) his team had chosen not to campaign actively in. While this strategy of bypassing the event had worked for him in some southern primaries, as a front runner, he no longer could pick and choose his campaigns. He finished third in Connecticut with 22% of the vote, and it seemed to most like any other loss, whether Anderson said he was competing or not. Next was Wisconsin, and this was thought to be Anderson's best chance for victory. But the bloom was off the rose by this time and he again finished third, winning 27% of the vote.[25]
Run as independent[edit]





This section's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Anderson campaign button


The Republican platform failed to endorse the Equal Rights Amendment or support extension of time for its ratification.[26] Anderson was a strong supporter of both.[27] Pollsters were finding that Anderson was much more popular across the country with all voters than he was in the Republican primary states. Without any campaigning, he was running at 22% nationally in a three-way race. Anderson’s personal aide and confidant, Tom Wartowski, encouraged him to remain in the Republican Party.[28]
Anderson faced a huge number of obstacles as a non-major party candidate: having to qualify for 51 ballots (which the major parties appeared on automatically), having to raise money to run a campaign (the major parties received close to $30 million in government money for their campaigns), having to win national coverage, having to build a campaign overnight, and having to find a suitable running mate among them. Initially, Anderson did very well as an independent. He built a new campaign team, qualified for every ballot, raised a great deal of money, and rose in the polls to as high as 26% in a Gallup poll.[29]
But the summer was cruel to Anderson. He had an overseas campaign tour to show his foreign policy credentials and it took a drubbing on national television. The major parties, particularly the Republicans, basked in the spotlight of their national conventions where Anderson was left out of the coverage. Anderson made an appearance with Ted Kennedy and it too was a huge error. By the third week of August he was in the 13–15% range in the polls.[30]
Anderson again recovered and went on a modest spree of successes. A critical issue for him was appearing in the fall presidential debates after the League of Women Voters invited him to appear due to popular interest in his candidacy, although he was only polling 12% at that time.[31] In late August, he named Patrick Lucey, the former two-term Democratic Governor of Wisconsin and Ambassador to Mexico as his running mate. Late in August, Anderson released a 317-page comprehensive platform, under the banner of the National Unity Party,[32] that was very well received. In early September, a court challenge to Federal Election Campaign Act was successful and Anderson qualified for post-election public funding. Also, Anderson submitted his petitions for his fifty-first ballot. Then, the League ruled that the polls showed that he had met the qualification threshold and said he would appear in the debates.[33]
Fall[edit]
This set off a controversy. Carter said that he would not appear on stage with Anderson, and sat out the debate, which hurt the President in the eyes of voters. Reagan and Anderson had a debate in Baltimore on September 21, 1980. Anderson did well, and polls showed he won a modest debate victory over Reagan. But Reagan, who had been portrayed by Carter throughout the campaign as something of a warmonger, proved to be a reasonable candidate and carried himself well in the debate. The debate was Anderson's big opportunity. He needed a break-out performance, but what he got was a modest victory. In the following weeks, Anderson slowly faded out of the picture with his support dropping from 16% to 10–12% in the first half of October. By the end of the month, Reagan debated Carter alone and Anderson's support continued to fade. Although Reagan would win a sizable victory, the polls showed the two major party candidates closer (Gallup's final poll was 47–44–8[34]) going into the election and it was clear that many would-be Anderson supporters were now supporting their second choice. In the end, Anderson finished with just under 7% of the vote.[35]
Most of Anderson's original support came from Rockefeller Republicans, who were more liberal than Reagan, but it bled away. Many prominent intellectuals, including All in the Family creator Norman Lear, and the editors of the liberal magazine The New Republic, also endorsed the Anderson campaign. He also had the support of many independents. Cartoonist Garry Trudeau's Doonesbury ran several strips sympathetic to the Anderson campaign.[36] According to the recently published journals of Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr., former First Lady Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis voted for Anderson, as did Schlesinger himself. Although the Carter campaign feared Anderson could be a spoiler, Anderson's campaign turned out to be "simply another option for frustrated voters who had already decided not to back Carter for another term. Polls found Anderson voters nearly as likely to list Reagan as their second choice as Carter."[37]
Anderson did not carry a single precinct in the country.[38] Anderson’s finish was still the best showing for a third party candidate since George Wallace’s 14 percent in 1968 and stands as the seventh best for any such candidate since the Civil War (trailing James B. Weaver’s 8.5 percent in 1892, Theodore Roosevelt’s 27 percent in 1912, Robert La Follette’s 17 percent in 1924, Wallace, and Ross Perot’s 19 percent and 8 percent in 1992 and 1996, respectively).[39]
He pursued Ohio's refusal to provide ballot access to the U.S. Supreme Court and won 5–4 in Anderson v. Celebrezze. His inability to make headway against the de facto two-party system as an independent in that election would later lead him to become an advocate for instant-runoff voting, helping to found FairVote in 1992.[citation needed]
Later career[edit]




Anderson speaking in 1999


By the end of the campaign, Anderson's support came mostly from college students. He capitalized on that by becoming a visiting professor at a series of universities: Stanford University, University of Southern California, Duke University, University of Illinois College of Law, Brandeis University, Bryn Mawr College, Oregon State University, University of Massachusetts Amherst, and Nova Southeastern University (his most recent post)[citation needed] and giving the lecture at the 1988 Waldo Family Lecture on International Relations at Old Dominion University.[40]
He was Chair of FairVote from 1996 to 2008 and continues to serve on its board, served as President of the World Federalist Association and on the advisory board of Public Campaign and the Electronic Privacy Information Center, and is of counsel to the Washington, DC-based law firm of Greenberg & Lieberman, LLC.[41] He was the first executive director of the Council for the National Interest, founded in 1989 by former Congressmen Paul Findley (R-IL) and Pete McCloskey (R-CA) to promote American interests in the Middle East.[42][43]
In the 2000 U.S. presidential election, he was briefly considered as possible candidate for the Reform Party nomination but instead endorsed Ralph Nader.[44] In January 2008, Anderson indicated strong support for the candidacy of fellow Illinoisan, Democratic contender Barack Obama.[45]
In 2012, he played a role in the creation of the Justice Party, a progressive, social-democratic party organized to support the candidacy of former Salt Lake City mayor Rocky Anderson (no relation) for the 2012 U.S. presidential election.[46][47]
See also[edit]

Anderson v. Celebrezze
Third party (United States)

Bibliography[edit]

Amy, Douglas J. (2002). Real Choices / New Voices (2nd ed.). New York: Columbia University Press. ISBN 0231125496. 
Bisnow, Mark (1983). Diary of a Dark Horse: The 1980 Anderson Presidential Campaign. Carbondale: Southern Illinois University Press. ISBN 0809311143. 
Mason, Jim (2011). No Holding Back: The 1980 John B. Anderson Presidential Campaign. Lanham, MD: University Press of America. ISBN 0761852263. 

References[edit]


^ "John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure". 4president.org/. Archived from the original on 2015-01-12. 
^ "About John Anderson". No Holding Back. 
^ Weaver Jr, Warren (August 26, 1980). "Anderson Chooses Lucey for his Ticket; Praises Ex-Wisconsin Governor as Qualified for the White House Seeking Broader Support Anderson Picks Lucey, Ex-Governor of Wisconsin, as Running Mate Matter of Prominence Sees Effect on Congressmen Gives Carter 'No Chance'". The New York Times. Retrieved May 6, 2010. 
^ Axelrod, David (March 6, 1980). "Wife a prime mover in the primary campaign". Chicago Tribune. 
^ Lawrence Kestenbaum. "Index to Politicians: Anderson, J". The Political Graveyard. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ [1]
^ a b 1980 campaign ad
^ "ANDERSON, John Bayard". Retrieved 18 January 2017. 
^ Mason (2011), 9–10.
^ Mason (2011), 10–14.
^ "Debate Transcript". Commission on Presidential Debates. Retrieved 2008-02-17. 
^ Mason (2011), 14–15, 234–35.
^ Mason (2011), 16-21.
^ Mason (2011), 24–27.
^ Ira Teinowitz, “Anderson-Lyon Race is Top Attraction,” Rockford Morning Star, 26 February 1978.
^ Mason (2011), 28–36.
^ campaign Jon Moore, ed., The Campaign for President: 1980 in Retrospect (Cambridge, MA: Ballinger, 1981)5
^ "From back in the pack John Anderson begins to move (July 29, 1979)". Retrieved 2017-01-18. 
^ CBS Evening News, 10 December 1979; NBC Nightly News, 13 December 1979.
^ Mason (2011), 53–119.
^ a b Mason (2011), 120–27.
^ a b Mason (2011), 133–56.
^ CBS Evening News, western edition, 4 March 1980; MacPherson, “Wow! Said John Anderson,” 6 March 1980; and Bisnow, Diary of a Dark Horse, 146.
^ Mason (2011), 158-170.
^ Mason (2011), 238.
^ Republican Party Platform of 1980, July 15, 1980. http://www.presidency.ucsb.edu
^ John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure, www.4president.org
^ Mason (2011), 264.
^ Mason (2011), 264–308.
^ "With Kennedy Aid, Carter Cuts Reagan Lead in Poll". New York Times. 19 August 1980. 
^ "Open Up the Debates: Green Party's Jill Stein Accuses Democrats & GOP of Rigging Debate Rules". Democracy Now!. August 18, 2016. 
^ Mason (2011), 352.
^ Mason (2011), 332-369.
^ "Election Polls - Accuracy Record in Presidential Elections". Gallup. 
^ Mason (2011), 366-408.
^ "Doonesbury's Timeline: 1980s". Retrieved 2015-02-16. 
^ Kornacki, Steve (April 4, 2011). "The myths that just won’t die". Salon. 
^ Mason (2011), 409, 529.
^ Tarr, Dave and Benenson, Bob; Elections A to Z, p. 632 ISBN 1506331505
^ "Waldo Family Lecture Series Digital Collection". Old Dominion University. Retrieved July 17, 2017. 
^ "Washington DC Lawyer – Washington Attorney – Patent Lawyer". Aplegal.com. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ Wa Aza, Ayoon (November 14, 2010). "How Pro-Israeli Lobbies Destroy U.S. Interests". Highbeam.com (Dar Al Hayat, International ed.). 
^ Hanely, Delinda C. (January 1, 2010). "CNI Cruises into a New Decade". Washington Report on Middle East Affairs. Highbeam.com. 
^ "Presidency 2000: Ralph Nader of Connecticut, Green Party Presidential Nominee". Politics1. Archived from the original on March 17, 2009. 
^ "Campaign digest". Seattle Times. January 7, 2008. p. A5.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Robert, Gehrke (2011-11-29). "Rocky Anderson returns – this time shooting for nation's top office". Salt Lake Tribune. Salt Lake City: Kearns-Tribune LLC. Retrieved 2011-11-29. 
^ Romboy, Dennis (November 30, 2011). "Rocky Anderson forms Justice Party, plans to run for president". Deseret News. Retrieved December 2, 2011. 


External links[edit]

United States Congress. "John B. Anderson (id: A000195)". Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. 
Appearances on C-SPAN



U.S. House of Representatives


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen
Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th congressional district
1961–1981
Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin








v
t
e


(1976 ←) United States presidential election, 1980 (→ 1984)



Republican Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Ronald Reagan


VP nominee
George H. W. Bush


Candidates
John B. Anderson
Howard Baker
George H. W. Bush
John Connally
Phil Crane
Bob Dole
Ben Fernandez
Harold Stassen





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Jimmy Carter


VP nominee
Walter Mondale


Candidates
Jerry Brown
Ted Kennedy
Ron Dellums





Independent



Candidate
John B. Anderson


VP candidate
Patrick Lucey










Other independent and third party candidates



Citizens Party



Nominee
Barry Commoner


VP nominee
LaDonna Harris





Libertarian Party



Nominee
Ed Clark


VP nominee
David Koch





Prohibition Party



Nominee
Ben Bubar


VP nominee
Earl Dodge





Socialist Party



Nominee
David McReynolds


VP nominee
Diane Drufenbrock





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee
Andrew Pulley
Alternate nominees
Richard Congress
Clifton DeBerry





Workers World Party



Nominee
Deirdre Griswold


VP nominee
Gavrielle Holmes





Independents and other candidates



Lyndon LaRouche
Maureen Smith
Running mate
Elizabeth Cervantes Barron
Warren Spannaus











Other 1980 elections
House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 7404989
LCCN: n50021916
ISNI: 0000 0000 8353 9503
GND: 120549891
SUDOC: 027716937
BNF: cb120281947 (data)
US Congress: A000195










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=John_B._Anderson&oldid=791016272"					
Categories: 1922 birthsLiving peopleHarvard Law School alumniUniversity of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign alumniBrandeis University facultyDuke University facultyUniversity of Massachusetts Amherst facultyOregon State University facultyIllinois IndependentsMembers of the Evangelical Free Church of AmericaMembers of the United States House of Representatives from IllinoisPoliticians from Rockford, IllinoisState attorneysAmerican people of Swedish descentUnited States Army soldiersUnited States presidential candidates, 198020th-century American politiciansWorld federalistsAmerican military personnel of World War IIIllinois RepublicansRepublican Party members of the United States House of RepresentativesHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using infobox officeholder with an atypical party valuePages using infobox officeholder with unknown parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2016Wikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2014All articles needing style editingWikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2011Articles with unsourced statements from February 2017Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


CatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolFrançaisNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 15:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









John B. Anderson - Wikipedia






















 






John B. Anderson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the American general, see John B. Anderson (general).


John B. Anderson



1980 photo






Chairman of the House Republican Conference


In office
January 3, 1969 – January 3, 1979


Leader
Gerald Ford
John Jacob Rhodes


Preceded by
Melvin Laird


Succeeded by
Samuel L. Devine


Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th district


In office
January 3, 1961 – January 3, 1981


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen


Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin





Personal details


Born
John Bayard Anderson
(1922-02-15) February 15, 1922 (age 95)
Rockford, Illinois, U.S.


Political party
Independent (1980–present)
Republican (1956–1980)


Spouse(s)
Keke Machakos (m. 1953)


Alma mater
University of Illinois
University of Illinois College of Law
Harvard Law School


John Bayard Anderson (born February 15, 1922) is a former United States Congressman and Presidential candidate from Illinois. He was a U.S. Representative from the 16th Congressional District of Illinois for ten terms, from 1961 through 1981. Anderson was a Republican but ran as an independent candidate in the 1980 presidential election.[1][2] He has been a political reform leader, including serving 12 years as chair of the board of FairVote.



Contents


1 Early life
2 Early career
3 Political career
4 1980 Presidential campaign

4.1 Rise
4.2 Run as independent
4.3 Fall


5 Later career
6 See also
7 Bibliography
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]
Anderson was born in Rockford, Illinois, where he grew up, the son of Mabel Edna (née Ring) and E. Albin Anderson. His father was a Swedish immigrant, as were his maternal grandparents.[3][4][5][6] In his youth, he worked in his family's grocery store.[7] He graduated as the valedictorian of his class at Rockford Central High School. He graduated from the University of Illinois in 1939, and started law school, but his education was interrupted by World War II. He enlisted in the Army in 1943, and served as a staff sergeant in the U.S. Field Artillery in France and Germany until the end of the war, receiving four battle stars.[7] After the war, Anderson returned to complete his education, eventually earning a Juris Doctor (J.D.) from the University of Illinois College of Law in 1946. [8]
Early career[edit]
He was admitted to the Illinois bar the same year, and practiced law in Rockford.[citation needed] Soon after, Anderson moved east to attend Harvard Law School, obtaining a Master of Laws (LL.M.) in 1949. While at Harvard, he served on the faculty of Northeastern University School of Law in Boston. In another brief return to Rockford, Anderson practiced at the law firm Large, Reno & Zahm (now Reno & Zahm LLP). Thereafter, Anderson joined the Foreign Service. From 1952 to 1955, he served in Berlin as the Economic Reporting Officer in the Eastern Affairs Division, as an adviser on the staff of the United States High Commissioner for Germany. At the end of his tour, he left the foreign service and once again returned to the practice of law in Rockford.[9]
Political career[edit]




Anderson in 1965


Soon after his return, Anderson was approached about running for public office. In 1956, Anderson was elected State's Attorney in Winnebago County, Illinois, first winning a four-person race in the April primary by 1,330 votes and then the general election in November by 11,456 votes. After serving for one term, he was ready to leave that office when the local congressman, 28-year incumbent Leo E. Allen, announced his retirement. Anderson joined the Republican primary for Allen's 16th District seat—the real contest in this then-solidly Republican district—with four other contenders. He won first the primary (by 5,900 votes) in April and then the general election (by 45,000 votes) in November.[10] He served in the United States House of Representatives for ten terms, from 1961 to 1981.
Initially, Anderson was among the most conservative members of the Republican caucus. Three times (in 1961, 1963, and 1965) in his early terms as a Congressman, Anderson introduced a constitutional amendment to attempt to "recognize the law and authority of Jesus Christ" over the United States.[11] The bills died quietly, but came back to haunt Anderson in his presidential candidacy.[12]
As he continued to serve, the atmosphere of the 1960s weighed on Anderson and he began to re-think some of his beliefs. By the late 1960s, Anderson's positions on social issues shifted to the left, though his fiscal philosophy remained largely conservative. At the same time, he was held in high esteem by his colleagues in the House. In 1964, he won appointment to a seat on the powerful Rules Committee. In 1969, he became Chairman of the House Republican Conference, the number three position in the House Republican hierarchy in what was (at that time) the minority party.[13]
Anderson increasingly found himself at odds with conservatives in his home district and other members of the House. He was not always a faithful supporter of the Republican agenda, despite his high rank in the Republican caucus. He was very critical of the Vietnam War, and was a very controversial critic of Richard Nixon during Watergate. In 1974, despite his criticism of Nixon, he was nearly swept out by the strong anti-Republican tide in that year's election; he was re-elected with 55 percent of the vote, what would be the lowest percentage of his career. His spot as the chairman of the House Republican Committee was challenged three times after his election. And, when Gerald Ford was defeated in the 1976 Presidential campaign, Anderson lost a key ally in Washington.[14]
In late 1977, a fundamentalist television minister from Rockford, Don Lyon, announced that he would challenge Anderson in the Republican primary. It was a contentious campaign, where Lyon with his experience before the camera proved to be a formidable candidate.[15] Lyon raised a great deal of money, won backing from many conservatives in the community and party, and put quite a scare into the Anderson team. Though Anderson was a leader in the House and the campaign commanded national attention, Anderson won the primary by 16% of the vote. Anderson was aided in this campaign by strong newspaper endorsements and crossover support from independents and Democrats.[16]
1980 Presidential campaign[edit]





This article's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In 1978, Anderson formed an exploratory committee,[17] finding little public or media interest. In late April 1979, Anderson made the decision to enter the Republican primary, joining a field that included Robert Dole, John Connally, Howard Baker, Harold Stassen, George H. W. Bush and Ronald Reagan. [18]
Within the last weeks of 1979 Anderson introduced his signature campaign proposal, advocating that a 50-cent a gallon gas tax be enacted with a corresponding 50% reduction in social security taxes.[19]
Anderson built state campaigns in four targeted states—New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Illinois, and Wisconsin. He won some political support among Republicans, picking up endorsements along the way that helped legitimize him in the race. He began to build support among media elites, who appreciated his articulateness, straightforward manner, moderate positions, and his refusal to walk down the conservative path that all of the other Republicans were traveling.[20]
Rise[edit]




March 13, 1980 in Chicago Howard K. Smith (center) moderates a League of Women Voters-sponsored presidential forum featuring Anderson (far right) and fellow Republican candidates Phil Crane (far left), George H. W. Bush (second from left), and Ronald Reagan (second from right).


In the first political event of 1980, in the Republican candidates debate in Des Moines, Iowa on January 5, unlike the others, he said lowering taxes, increasing defense spending, and balancing the budget were an impossible combination. In a stirring summation,[21] Anderson invoked his father's emigration to the United States and said that we would have to make sacrifices today for a better tomorrow. For the next week, Anderson's name and face were all over the national news programs, in newspapers, and in national news magazines.[21]
Anderson spent less than $2000 in the state, but he finished with 4.3% of the vote. The television networks were covering the event, portraying Anderson to a national audience as a man of character and principle.[22] When the voters in New Hampshire went to the polls, Anderson again exceeded the expectations, finishing fourth with just under 10% of the vote.[22]
Anderson was declared the winner in both Massachusetts and Vermont by the Associated Press,[23] but in the wee hours of the morning ended up losing both primaries by an eyelash. In Massachusetts, he lost to George Bush by 0.3% and in Vermont he lost to Reagan by 690 votes. Nonetheless, Anderson was now a top-tier candidate in the Republican race and for the first time a true contender for the nomination.[24]
The next major primary for Anderson was in Illinois, his home state. He arrived there after his New England triumph and had a lead in the state polls. But his Illinois campaign struggled despite endorsements from the state's two largest newspapers. His campaign, no longer taken lightly by his opponents, was outmatched organizationally and he was ganged up upon in a candidate's debate. Reagan defeated him 48% to 37%. Anderson carried Chicago and Rockford (the state's two largest cities at the time), but he was clobbered in the southern section of the state. The next week, there was a primary in Connecticut, which (while Anderson was on the ballot) his team had chosen not to campaign actively in. While this strategy of bypassing the event had worked for him in some southern primaries, as a front runner, he no longer could pick and choose his campaigns. He finished third in Connecticut with 22% of the vote, and it seemed to most like any other loss, whether Anderson said he was competing or not. Next was Wisconsin, and this was thought to be Anderson's best chance for victory. But the bloom was off the rose by this time and he again finished third, winning 27% of the vote.[25]
Run as independent[edit]





This section's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Anderson campaign button


The Republican platform failed to endorse the Equal Rights Amendment or support extension of time for its ratification.[26] Anderson was a strong supporter of both.[27] Pollsters were finding that Anderson was much more popular across the country with all voters than he was in the Republican primary states. Without any campaigning, he was running at 22% nationally in a three-way race. Anderson’s personal aide and confidant, Tom Wartowski, encouraged him to remain in the Republican Party.[28]
Anderson faced a huge number of obstacles as a non-major party candidate: having to qualify for 51 ballots (which the major parties appeared on automatically), having to raise money to run a campaign (the major parties received close to $30 million in government money for their campaigns), having to win national coverage, having to build a campaign overnight, and having to find a suitable running mate among them. Initially, Anderson did very well as an independent. He built a new campaign team, qualified for every ballot, raised a great deal of money, and rose in the polls to as high as 26% in a Gallup poll.[29]
But the summer was cruel to Anderson. He had an overseas campaign tour to show his foreign policy credentials and it took a drubbing on national television. The major parties, particularly the Republicans, basked in the spotlight of their national conventions where Anderson was left out of the coverage. Anderson made an appearance with Ted Kennedy and it too was a huge error. By the third week of August he was in the 13–15% range in the polls.[30]
Anderson again recovered and went on a modest spree of successes. A critical issue for him was appearing in the fall presidential debates after the League of Women Voters invited him to appear due to popular interest in his candidacy, although he was only polling 12% at that time.[31] In late August, he named Patrick Lucey, the former two-term Democratic Governor of Wisconsin and Ambassador to Mexico as his running mate. Late in August, Anderson released a 317-page comprehensive platform, under the banner of the National Unity Party,[32] that was very well received. In early September, a court challenge to Federal Election Campaign Act was successful and Anderson qualified for post-election public funding. Also, Anderson submitted his petitions for his fifty-first ballot. Then, the League ruled that the polls showed that he had met the qualification threshold and said he would appear in the debates.[33]
Fall[edit]
This set off a controversy. Carter said that he would not appear on stage with Anderson, and sat out the debate, which hurt the President in the eyes of voters. Reagan and Anderson had a debate in Baltimore on September 21, 1980. Anderson did well, and polls showed he won a modest debate victory over Reagan. But Reagan, who had been portrayed by Carter throughout the campaign as something of a warmonger, proved to be a reasonable candidate and carried himself well in the debate. The debate was Anderson's big opportunity. He needed a break-out performance, but what he got was a modest victory. In the following weeks, Anderson slowly faded out of the picture with his support dropping from 16% to 10–12% in the first half of October. By the end of the month, Reagan debated Carter alone and Anderson's support continued to fade. Although Reagan would win a sizable victory, the polls showed the two major party candidates closer (Gallup's final poll was 47–44–8[34]) going into the election and it was clear that many would-be Anderson supporters were now supporting their second choice. In the end, Anderson finished with just under 7% of the vote.[35]
Most of Anderson's original support came from Rockefeller Republicans, who were more liberal than Reagan, but it bled away. Many prominent intellectuals, including All in the Family creator Norman Lear, and the editors of the liberal magazine The New Republic, also endorsed the Anderson campaign. He also had the support of many independents. Cartoonist Garry Trudeau's Doonesbury ran several strips sympathetic to the Anderson campaign.[36] According to the recently published journals of Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr., former First Lady Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis voted for Anderson, as did Schlesinger himself. Although the Carter campaign feared Anderson could be a spoiler, Anderson's campaign turned out to be "simply another option for frustrated voters who had already decided not to back Carter for another term. Polls found Anderson voters nearly as likely to list Reagan as their second choice as Carter."[37]
Anderson did not carry a single precinct in the country.[38] Anderson’s finish was still the best showing for a third party candidate since George Wallace’s 14 percent in 1968 and stands as the seventh best for any such candidate since the Civil War (trailing James B. Weaver’s 8.5 percent in 1892, Theodore Roosevelt’s 27 percent in 1912, Robert La Follette’s 17 percent in 1924, Wallace, and Ross Perot’s 19 percent and 8 percent in 1992 and 1996, respectively).[39]
He pursued Ohio's refusal to provide ballot access to the U.S. Supreme Court and won 5–4 in Anderson v. Celebrezze. His inability to make headway against the de facto two-party system as an independent in that election would later lead him to become an advocate for instant-runoff voting, helping to found FairVote in 1992.[citation needed]
Later career[edit]




Anderson speaking in 1999


By the end of the campaign, Anderson's support came mostly from college students. He capitalized on that by becoming a visiting professor at a series of universities: Stanford University, University of Southern California, Duke University, University of Illinois College of Law, Brandeis University, Bryn Mawr College, Oregon State University, University of Massachusetts Amherst, and Nova Southeastern University (his most recent post)[citation needed] and giving the lecture at the 1988 Waldo Family Lecture on International Relations at Old Dominion University.[40]
He was Chair of FairVote from 1996 to 2008 and continues to serve on its board, served as President of the World Federalist Association and on the advisory board of Public Campaign and the Electronic Privacy Information Center, and is of counsel to the Washington, DC-based law firm of Greenberg & Lieberman, LLC.[41] He was the first executive director of the Council for the National Interest, founded in 1989 by former Congressmen Paul Findley (R-IL) and Pete McCloskey (R-CA) to promote American interests in the Middle East.[42][43]
In the 2000 U.S. presidential election, he was briefly considered as possible candidate for the Reform Party nomination but instead endorsed Ralph Nader.[44] In January 2008, Anderson indicated strong support for the candidacy of fellow Illinoisan, Democratic contender Barack Obama.[45]
In 2012, he played a role in the creation of the Justice Party, a progressive, social-democratic party organized to support the candidacy of former Salt Lake City mayor Rocky Anderson (no relation) for the 2012 U.S. presidential election.[46][47]
See also[edit]

Anderson v. Celebrezze
Third party (United States)

Bibliography[edit]

Amy, Douglas J. (2002). Real Choices / New Voices (2nd ed.). New York: Columbia University Press. ISBN 0231125496. 
Bisnow, Mark (1983). Diary of a Dark Horse: The 1980 Anderson Presidential Campaign. Carbondale: Southern Illinois University Press. ISBN 0809311143. 
Mason, Jim (2011). No Holding Back: The 1980 John B. Anderson Presidential Campaign. Lanham, MD: University Press of America. ISBN 0761852263. 

References[edit]


^ "John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure". 4president.org/. Archived from the original on 2015-01-12. 
^ "About John Anderson". No Holding Back. 
^ Weaver Jr, Warren (August 26, 1980). "Anderson Chooses Lucey for his Ticket; Praises Ex-Wisconsin Governor as Qualified for the White House Seeking Broader Support Anderson Picks Lucey, Ex-Governor of Wisconsin, as Running Mate Matter of Prominence Sees Effect on Congressmen Gives Carter 'No Chance'". The New York Times. Retrieved May 6, 2010. 
^ Axelrod, David (March 6, 1980). "Wife a prime mover in the primary campaign". Chicago Tribune. 
^ Lawrence Kestenbaum. "Index to Politicians: Anderson, J". The Political Graveyard. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ [1]
^ a b 1980 campaign ad
^ "ANDERSON, John Bayard". Retrieved 18 January 2017. 
^ Mason (2011), 9–10.
^ Mason (2011), 10–14.
^ "Debate Transcript". Commission on Presidential Debates. Retrieved 2008-02-17. 
^ Mason (2011), 14–15, 234–35.
^ Mason (2011), 16-21.
^ Mason (2011), 24–27.
^ Ira Teinowitz, “Anderson-Lyon Race is Top Attraction,” Rockford Morning Star, 26 February 1978.
^ Mason (2011), 28–36.
^ campaign Jon Moore, ed., The Campaign for President: 1980 in Retrospect (Cambridge, MA: Ballinger, 1981)5
^ "From back in the pack John Anderson begins to move (July 29, 1979)". Retrieved 2017-01-18. 
^ CBS Evening News, 10 December 1979; NBC Nightly News, 13 December 1979.
^ Mason (2011), 53–119.
^ a b Mason (2011), 120–27.
^ a b Mason (2011), 133–56.
^ CBS Evening News, western edition, 4 March 1980; MacPherson, “Wow! Said John Anderson,” 6 March 1980; and Bisnow, Diary of a Dark Horse, 146.
^ Mason (2011), 158-170.
^ Mason (2011), 238.
^ Republican Party Platform of 1980, July 15, 1980. http://www.presidency.ucsb.edu
^ John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure, www.4president.org
^ Mason (2011), 264.
^ Mason (2011), 264–308.
^ "With Kennedy Aid, Carter Cuts Reagan Lead in Poll". New York Times. 19 August 1980. 
^ "Open Up the Debates: Green Party's Jill Stein Accuses Democrats & GOP of Rigging Debate Rules". Democracy Now!. August 18, 2016. 
^ Mason (2011), 352.
^ Mason (2011), 332-369.
^ "Election Polls - Accuracy Record in Presidential Elections". Gallup. 
^ Mason (2011), 366-408.
^ "Doonesbury's Timeline: 1980s". Retrieved 2015-02-16. 
^ Kornacki, Steve (April 4, 2011). "The myths that just won’t die". Salon. 
^ Mason (2011), 409, 529.
^ Tarr, Dave and Benenson, Bob; Elections A to Z, p. 632 ISBN 1506331505
^ "Waldo Family Lecture Series Digital Collection". Old Dominion University. Retrieved July 17, 2017. 
^ "Washington DC Lawyer – Washington Attorney – Patent Lawyer". Aplegal.com. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ Wa Aza, Ayoon (November 14, 2010). "How Pro-Israeli Lobbies Destroy U.S. Interests". Highbeam.com (Dar Al Hayat, International ed.). 
^ Hanely, Delinda C. (January 1, 2010). "CNI Cruises into a New Decade". Washington Report on Middle East Affairs. Highbeam.com. 
^ "Presidency 2000: Ralph Nader of Connecticut, Green Party Presidential Nominee". Politics1. Archived from the original on March 17, 2009. 
^ "Campaign digest". Seattle Times. January 7, 2008. p. A5.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Robert, Gehrke (2011-11-29). "Rocky Anderson returns – this time shooting for nation's top office". Salt Lake Tribune. Salt Lake City: Kearns-Tribune LLC. Retrieved 2011-11-29. 
^ Romboy, Dennis (November 30, 2011). "Rocky Anderson forms Justice Party, plans to run for president". Deseret News. Retrieved December 2, 2011. 


External links[edit]

United States Congress. "John B. Anderson (id: A000195)". Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. 
Appearances on C-SPAN



U.S. House of Representatives


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen
Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th congressional district
1961–1981
Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin








v
t
e


(1976 ←) United States presidential election, 1980 (→ 1984)



Republican Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Ronald Reagan


VP nominee
George H. W. Bush


Candidates
John B. Anderson
Howard Baker
George H. W. Bush
John Connally
Phil Crane
Bob Dole
Ben Fernandez
Harold Stassen





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Jimmy Carter


VP nominee
Walter Mondale


Candidates
Jerry Brown
Ted Kennedy
Ron Dellums





Independent



Candidate
John B. Anderson


VP candidate
Patrick Lucey










Other independent and third party candidates



Citizens Party



Nominee
Barry Commoner


VP nominee
LaDonna Harris





Libertarian Party



Nominee
Ed Clark


VP nominee
David Koch





Prohibition Party



Nominee
Ben Bubar


VP nominee
Earl Dodge





Socialist Party



Nominee
David McReynolds


VP nominee
Diane Drufenbrock





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee
Andrew Pulley
Alternate nominees
Richard Congress
Clifton DeBerry





Workers World Party



Nominee
Deirdre Griswold


VP nominee
Gavrielle Holmes





Independents and other candidates



Lyndon LaRouche
Maureen Smith
Running mate
Elizabeth Cervantes Barron
Warren Spannaus











Other 1980 elections
House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 7404989
LCCN: n50021916
ISNI: 0000 0000 8353 9503
GND: 120549891
SUDOC: 027716937
BNF: cb120281947 (data)
US Congress: A000195










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=John_B._Anderson&oldid=791016272"					
Categories: 1922 birthsLiving peopleHarvard Law School alumniUniversity of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign alumniBrandeis University facultyDuke University facultyUniversity of Massachusetts Amherst facultyOregon State University facultyIllinois IndependentsMembers of the Evangelical Free Church of AmericaMembers of the United States House of Representatives from IllinoisPoliticians from Rockford, IllinoisState attorneysAmerican people of Swedish descentUnited States Army soldiersUnited States presidential candidates, 198020th-century American politiciansWorld federalistsAmerican military personnel of World War IIIllinois RepublicansRepublican Party members of the United States House of RepresentativesHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using infobox officeholder with an atypical party valuePages using infobox officeholder with unknown parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2016Wikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2014All articles needing style editingWikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2011Articles with unsourced statements from February 2017Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


CatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolFrançaisNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 15:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









John B. Anderson - Wikipedia






















 






John B. Anderson

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the American general, see John B. Anderson (general).


John B. Anderson



1980 photo






Chairman of the House Republican Conference


In office
January 3, 1969 – January 3, 1979


Leader
Gerald Ford
John Jacob Rhodes


Preceded by
Melvin Laird


Succeeded by
Samuel L. Devine


Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th district


In office
January 3, 1961 – January 3, 1981


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen


Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin





Personal details


Born
John Bayard Anderson
(1922-02-15) February 15, 1922 (age 95)
Rockford, Illinois, U.S.


Political party
Independent (1980–present)
Republican (1956–1980)


Spouse(s)
Keke Machakos (m. 1953)


Alma mater
University of Illinois
University of Illinois College of Law
Harvard Law School


John Bayard Anderson (born February 15, 1922) is a former United States Congressman and Presidential candidate from Illinois. He was a U.S. Representative from the 16th Congressional District of Illinois for ten terms, from 1961 through 1981. Anderson was a Republican but ran as an independent candidate in the 1980 presidential election.[1][2] He has been a political reform leader, including serving 12 years as chair of the board of FairVote.



Contents


1 Early life
2 Early career
3 Political career
4 1980 Presidential campaign

4.1 Rise
4.2 Run as independent
4.3 Fall


5 Later career
6 See also
7 Bibliography
8 References
9 External links



Early life[edit]
Anderson was born in Rockford, Illinois, where he grew up, the son of Mabel Edna (née Ring) and E. Albin Anderson. His father was a Swedish immigrant, as were his maternal grandparents.[3][4][5][6] In his youth, he worked in his family's grocery store.[7] He graduated as the valedictorian of his class at Rockford Central High School. He graduated from the University of Illinois in 1939, and started law school, but his education was interrupted by World War II. He enlisted in the Army in 1943, and served as a staff sergeant in the U.S. Field Artillery in France and Germany until the end of the war, receiving four battle stars.[7] After the war, Anderson returned to complete his education, eventually earning a Juris Doctor (J.D.) from the University of Illinois College of Law in 1946. [8]
Early career[edit]
He was admitted to the Illinois bar the same year, and practiced law in Rockford.[citation needed] Soon after, Anderson moved east to attend Harvard Law School, obtaining a Master of Laws (LL.M.) in 1949. While at Harvard, he served on the faculty of Northeastern University School of Law in Boston. In another brief return to Rockford, Anderson practiced at the law firm Large, Reno & Zahm (now Reno & Zahm LLP). Thereafter, Anderson joined the Foreign Service. From 1952 to 1955, he served in Berlin as the Economic Reporting Officer in the Eastern Affairs Division, as an adviser on the staff of the United States High Commissioner for Germany. At the end of his tour, he left the foreign service and once again returned to the practice of law in Rockford.[9]
Political career[edit]




Anderson in 1965


Soon after his return, Anderson was approached about running for public office. In 1956, Anderson was elected State's Attorney in Winnebago County, Illinois, first winning a four-person race in the April primary by 1,330 votes and then the general election in November by 11,456 votes. After serving for one term, he was ready to leave that office when the local congressman, 28-year incumbent Leo E. Allen, announced his retirement. Anderson joined the Republican primary for Allen's 16th District seat—the real contest in this then-solidly Republican district—with four other contenders. He won first the primary (by 5,900 votes) in April and then the general election (by 45,000 votes) in November.[10] He served in the United States House of Representatives for ten terms, from 1961 to 1981.
Initially, Anderson was among the most conservative members of the Republican caucus. Three times (in 1961, 1963, and 1965) in his early terms as a Congressman, Anderson introduced a constitutional amendment to attempt to "recognize the law and authority of Jesus Christ" over the United States.[11] The bills died quietly, but came back to haunt Anderson in his presidential candidacy.[12]
As he continued to serve, the atmosphere of the 1960s weighed on Anderson and he began to re-think some of his beliefs. By the late 1960s, Anderson's positions on social issues shifted to the left, though his fiscal philosophy remained largely conservative. At the same time, he was held in high esteem by his colleagues in the House. In 1964, he won appointment to a seat on the powerful Rules Committee. In 1969, he became Chairman of the House Republican Conference, the number three position in the House Republican hierarchy in what was (at that time) the minority party.[13]
Anderson increasingly found himself at odds with conservatives in his home district and other members of the House. He was not always a faithful supporter of the Republican agenda, despite his high rank in the Republican caucus. He was very critical of the Vietnam War, and was a very controversial critic of Richard Nixon during Watergate. In 1974, despite his criticism of Nixon, he was nearly swept out by the strong anti-Republican tide in that year's election; he was re-elected with 55 percent of the vote, what would be the lowest percentage of his career. His spot as the chairman of the House Republican Committee was challenged three times after his election. And, when Gerald Ford was defeated in the 1976 Presidential campaign, Anderson lost a key ally in Washington.[14]
In late 1977, a fundamentalist television minister from Rockford, Don Lyon, announced that he would challenge Anderson in the Republican primary. It was a contentious campaign, where Lyon with his experience before the camera proved to be a formidable candidate.[15] Lyon raised a great deal of money, won backing from many conservatives in the community and party, and put quite a scare into the Anderson team. Though Anderson was a leader in the House and the campaign commanded national attention, Anderson won the primary by 16% of the vote. Anderson was aided in this campaign by strong newspaper endorsements and crossover support from independents and Democrats.[16]
1980 Presidential campaign[edit]





This article's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2014) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


In 1978, Anderson formed an exploratory committee,[17] finding little public or media interest. In late April 1979, Anderson made the decision to enter the Republican primary, joining a field that included Robert Dole, John Connally, Howard Baker, Harold Stassen, George H. W. Bush and Ronald Reagan. [18]
Within the last weeks of 1979 Anderson introduced his signature campaign proposal, advocating that a 50-cent a gallon gas tax be enacted with a corresponding 50% reduction in social security taxes.[19]
Anderson built state campaigns in four targeted states—New Hampshire, Massachusetts, Illinois, and Wisconsin. He won some political support among Republicans, picking up endorsements along the way that helped legitimize him in the race. He began to build support among media elites, who appreciated his articulateness, straightforward manner, moderate positions, and his refusal to walk down the conservative path that all of the other Republicans were traveling.[20]
Rise[edit]




March 13, 1980 in Chicago Howard K. Smith (center) moderates a League of Women Voters-sponsored presidential forum featuring Anderson (far right) and fellow Republican candidates Phil Crane (far left), George H. W. Bush (second from left), and Ronald Reagan (second from right).


In the first political event of 1980, in the Republican candidates debate in Des Moines, Iowa on January 5, unlike the others, he said lowering taxes, increasing defense spending, and balancing the budget were an impossible combination. In a stirring summation,[21] Anderson invoked his father's emigration to the United States and said that we would have to make sacrifices today for a better tomorrow. For the next week, Anderson's name and face were all over the national news programs, in newspapers, and in national news magazines.[21]
Anderson spent less than $2000 in the state, but he finished with 4.3% of the vote. The television networks were covering the event, portraying Anderson to a national audience as a man of character and principle.[22] When the voters in New Hampshire went to the polls, Anderson again exceeded the expectations, finishing fourth with just under 10% of the vote.[22]
Anderson was declared the winner in both Massachusetts and Vermont by the Associated Press,[23] but in the wee hours of the morning ended up losing both primaries by an eyelash. In Massachusetts, he lost to George Bush by 0.3% and in Vermont he lost to Reagan by 690 votes. Nonetheless, Anderson was now a top-tier candidate in the Republican race and for the first time a true contender for the nomination.[24]
The next major primary for Anderson was in Illinois, his home state. He arrived there after his New England triumph and had a lead in the state polls. But his Illinois campaign struggled despite endorsements from the state's two largest newspapers. His campaign, no longer taken lightly by his opponents, was outmatched organizationally and he was ganged up upon in a candidate's debate. Reagan defeated him 48% to 37%. Anderson carried Chicago and Rockford (the state's two largest cities at the time), but he was clobbered in the southern section of the state. The next week, there was a primary in Connecticut, which (while Anderson was on the ballot) his team had chosen not to campaign actively in. While this strategy of bypassing the event had worked for him in some southern primaries, as a front runner, he no longer could pick and choose his campaigns. He finished third in Connecticut with 22% of the vote, and it seemed to most like any other loss, whether Anderson said he was competing or not. Next was Wisconsin, and this was thought to be Anderson's best chance for victory. But the bloom was off the rose by this time and he again finished third, winning 27% of the vote.[25]
Run as independent[edit]





This section's tone or style may not reflect the encyclopedic tone used on Wikipedia. See Wikipedia's guide to writing better articles for suggestions. (May 2016) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)






Anderson campaign button


The Republican platform failed to endorse the Equal Rights Amendment or support extension of time for its ratification.[26] Anderson was a strong supporter of both.[27] Pollsters were finding that Anderson was much more popular across the country with all voters than he was in the Republican primary states. Without any campaigning, he was running at 22% nationally in a three-way race. Anderson’s personal aide and confidant, Tom Wartowski, encouraged him to remain in the Republican Party.[28]
Anderson faced a huge number of obstacles as a non-major party candidate: having to qualify for 51 ballots (which the major parties appeared on automatically), having to raise money to run a campaign (the major parties received close to $30 million in government money for their campaigns), having to win national coverage, having to build a campaign overnight, and having to find a suitable running mate among them. Initially, Anderson did very well as an independent. He built a new campaign team, qualified for every ballot, raised a great deal of money, and rose in the polls to as high as 26% in a Gallup poll.[29]
But the summer was cruel to Anderson. He had an overseas campaign tour to show his foreign policy credentials and it took a drubbing on national television. The major parties, particularly the Republicans, basked in the spotlight of their national conventions where Anderson was left out of the coverage. Anderson made an appearance with Ted Kennedy and it too was a huge error. By the third week of August he was in the 13–15% range in the polls.[30]
Anderson again recovered and went on a modest spree of successes. A critical issue for him was appearing in the fall presidential debates after the League of Women Voters invited him to appear due to popular interest in his candidacy, although he was only polling 12% at that time.[31] In late August, he named Patrick Lucey, the former two-term Democratic Governor of Wisconsin and Ambassador to Mexico as his running mate. Late in August, Anderson released a 317-page comprehensive platform, under the banner of the National Unity Party,[32] that was very well received. In early September, a court challenge to Federal Election Campaign Act was successful and Anderson qualified for post-election public funding. Also, Anderson submitted his petitions for his fifty-first ballot. Then, the League ruled that the polls showed that he had met the qualification threshold and said he would appear in the debates.[33]
Fall[edit]
This set off a controversy. Carter said that he would not appear on stage with Anderson, and sat out the debate, which hurt the President in the eyes of voters. Reagan and Anderson had a debate in Baltimore on September 21, 1980. Anderson did well, and polls showed he won a modest debate victory over Reagan. But Reagan, who had been portrayed by Carter throughout the campaign as something of a warmonger, proved to be a reasonable candidate and carried himself well in the debate. The debate was Anderson's big opportunity. He needed a break-out performance, but what he got was a modest victory. In the following weeks, Anderson slowly faded out of the picture with his support dropping from 16% to 10–12% in the first half of October. By the end of the month, Reagan debated Carter alone and Anderson's support continued to fade. Although Reagan would win a sizable victory, the polls showed the two major party candidates closer (Gallup's final poll was 47–44–8[34]) going into the election and it was clear that many would-be Anderson supporters were now supporting their second choice. In the end, Anderson finished with just under 7% of the vote.[35]
Most of Anderson's original support came from Rockefeller Republicans, who were more liberal than Reagan, but it bled away. Many prominent intellectuals, including All in the Family creator Norman Lear, and the editors of the liberal magazine The New Republic, also endorsed the Anderson campaign. He also had the support of many independents. Cartoonist Garry Trudeau's Doonesbury ran several strips sympathetic to the Anderson campaign.[36] According to the recently published journals of Arthur M. Schlesinger Jr., former First Lady Jacqueline Kennedy Onassis voted for Anderson, as did Schlesinger himself. Although the Carter campaign feared Anderson could be a spoiler, Anderson's campaign turned out to be "simply another option for frustrated voters who had already decided not to back Carter for another term. Polls found Anderson voters nearly as likely to list Reagan as their second choice as Carter."[37]
Anderson did not carry a single precinct in the country.[38] Anderson’s finish was still the best showing for a third party candidate since George Wallace’s 14 percent in 1968 and stands as the seventh best for any such candidate since the Civil War (trailing James B. Weaver’s 8.5 percent in 1892, Theodore Roosevelt’s 27 percent in 1912, Robert La Follette’s 17 percent in 1924, Wallace, and Ross Perot’s 19 percent and 8 percent in 1992 and 1996, respectively).[39]
He pursued Ohio's refusal to provide ballot access to the U.S. Supreme Court and won 5–4 in Anderson v. Celebrezze. His inability to make headway against the de facto two-party system as an independent in that election would later lead him to become an advocate for instant-runoff voting, helping to found FairVote in 1992.[citation needed]
Later career[edit]




Anderson speaking in 1999


By the end of the campaign, Anderson's support came mostly from college students. He capitalized on that by becoming a visiting professor at a series of universities: Stanford University, University of Southern California, Duke University, University of Illinois College of Law, Brandeis University, Bryn Mawr College, Oregon State University, University of Massachusetts Amherst, and Nova Southeastern University (his most recent post)[citation needed] and giving the lecture at the 1988 Waldo Family Lecture on International Relations at Old Dominion University.[40]
He was Chair of FairVote from 1996 to 2008 and continues to serve on its board, served as President of the World Federalist Association and on the advisory board of Public Campaign and the Electronic Privacy Information Center, and is of counsel to the Washington, DC-based law firm of Greenberg & Lieberman, LLC.[41] He was the first executive director of the Council for the National Interest, founded in 1989 by former Congressmen Paul Findley (R-IL) and Pete McCloskey (R-CA) to promote American interests in the Middle East.[42][43]
In the 2000 U.S. presidential election, he was briefly considered as possible candidate for the Reform Party nomination but instead endorsed Ralph Nader.[44] In January 2008, Anderson indicated strong support for the candidacy of fellow Illinoisan, Democratic contender Barack Obama.[45]
In 2012, he played a role in the creation of the Justice Party, a progressive, social-democratic party organized to support the candidacy of former Salt Lake City mayor Rocky Anderson (no relation) for the 2012 U.S. presidential election.[46][47]
See also[edit]

Anderson v. Celebrezze
Third party (United States)

Bibliography[edit]

Amy, Douglas J. (2002). Real Choices / New Voices (2nd ed.). New York: Columbia University Press. ISBN 0231125496. 
Bisnow, Mark (1983). Diary of a Dark Horse: The 1980 Anderson Presidential Campaign. Carbondale: Southern Illinois University Press. ISBN 0809311143. 
Mason, Jim (2011). No Holding Back: The 1980 John B. Anderson Presidential Campaign. Lanham, MD: University Press of America. ISBN 0761852263. 

References[edit]


^ "John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure". 4president.org/. Archived from the original on 2015-01-12. 
^ "About John Anderson". No Holding Back. 
^ Weaver Jr, Warren (August 26, 1980). "Anderson Chooses Lucey for his Ticket; Praises Ex-Wisconsin Governor as Qualified for the White House Seeking Broader Support Anderson Picks Lucey, Ex-Governor of Wisconsin, as Running Mate Matter of Prominence Sees Effect on Congressmen Gives Carter 'No Chance'". The New York Times. Retrieved May 6, 2010. 
^ Axelrod, David (March 6, 1980). "Wife a prime mover in the primary campaign". Chicago Tribune. 
^ Lawrence Kestenbaum. "Index to Politicians: Anderson, J". The Political Graveyard. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ [1]
^ a b 1980 campaign ad
^ "ANDERSON, John Bayard". Retrieved 18 January 2017. 
^ Mason (2011), 9–10.
^ Mason (2011), 10–14.
^ "Debate Transcript". Commission on Presidential Debates. Retrieved 2008-02-17. 
^ Mason (2011), 14–15, 234–35.
^ Mason (2011), 16-21.
^ Mason (2011), 24–27.
^ Ira Teinowitz, “Anderson-Lyon Race is Top Attraction,” Rockford Morning Star, 26 February 1978.
^ Mason (2011), 28–36.
^ campaign Jon Moore, ed., The Campaign for President: 1980 in Retrospect (Cambridge, MA: Ballinger, 1981)5
^ "From back in the pack John Anderson begins to move (July 29, 1979)". Retrieved 2017-01-18. 
^ CBS Evening News, 10 December 1979; NBC Nightly News, 13 December 1979.
^ Mason (2011), 53–119.
^ a b Mason (2011), 120–27.
^ a b Mason (2011), 133–56.
^ CBS Evening News, western edition, 4 March 1980; MacPherson, “Wow! Said John Anderson,” 6 March 1980; and Bisnow, Diary of a Dark Horse, 146.
^ Mason (2011), 158-170.
^ Mason (2011), 238.
^ Republican Party Platform of 1980, July 15, 1980. http://www.presidency.ucsb.edu
^ John Anderson for President 1980 Campaign Brochure, www.4president.org
^ Mason (2011), 264.
^ Mason (2011), 264–308.
^ "With Kennedy Aid, Carter Cuts Reagan Lead in Poll". New York Times. 19 August 1980. 
^ "Open Up the Debates: Green Party's Jill Stein Accuses Democrats & GOP of Rigging Debate Rules". Democracy Now!. August 18, 2016. 
^ Mason (2011), 352.
^ Mason (2011), 332-369.
^ "Election Polls - Accuracy Record in Presidential Elections". Gallup. 
^ Mason (2011), 366-408.
^ "Doonesbury's Timeline: 1980s". Retrieved 2015-02-16. 
^ Kornacki, Steve (April 4, 2011). "The myths that just won’t die". Salon. 
^ Mason (2011), 409, 529.
^ Tarr, Dave and Benenson, Bob; Elections A to Z, p. 632 ISBN 1506331505
^ "Waldo Family Lecture Series Digital Collection". Old Dominion University. Retrieved July 17, 2017. 
^ "Washington DC Lawyer – Washington Attorney – Patent Lawyer". Aplegal.com. Retrieved 2011-07-28. 
^ Wa Aza, Ayoon (November 14, 2010). "How Pro-Israeli Lobbies Destroy U.S. Interests". Highbeam.com (Dar Al Hayat, International ed.). 
^ Hanely, Delinda C. (January 1, 2010). "CNI Cruises into a New Decade". Washington Report on Middle East Affairs. Highbeam.com. 
^ "Presidency 2000: Ralph Nader of Connecticut, Green Party Presidential Nominee". Politics1. Archived from the original on March 17, 2009. 
^ "Campaign digest". Seattle Times. January 7, 2008. p. A5.  |access-date= requires |url= (help)
^ Robert, Gehrke (2011-11-29). "Rocky Anderson returns – this time shooting for nation's top office". Salt Lake Tribune. Salt Lake City: Kearns-Tribune LLC. Retrieved 2011-11-29. 
^ Romboy, Dennis (November 30, 2011). "Rocky Anderson forms Justice Party, plans to run for president". Deseret News. Retrieved December 2, 2011. 


External links[edit]

United States Congress. "John B. Anderson (id: A000195)". Biographical Directory of the United States Congress. 
Appearances on C-SPAN



U.S. House of Representatives


Preceded by
Leo E. Allen
Member of the U.S. House of Representatives
from Illinois's 16th congressional district
1961–1981
Succeeded by
Lynn Morley Martin








v
t
e


(1976 ←) United States presidential election, 1980 (→ 1984)



Republican Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Ronald Reagan


VP nominee
George H. W. Bush


Candidates
John B. Anderson
Howard Baker
George H. W. Bush
John Connally
Phil Crane
Bob Dole
Ben Fernandez
Harold Stassen





Democratic Party

Convention
Primaries

Primary results





Nominee
Jimmy Carter


VP nominee
Walter Mondale


Candidates
Jerry Brown
Ted Kennedy
Ron Dellums





Independent



Candidate
John B. Anderson


VP candidate
Patrick Lucey










Other independent and third party candidates



Citizens Party



Nominee
Barry Commoner


VP nominee
LaDonna Harris





Libertarian Party



Nominee
Ed Clark


VP nominee
David Koch





Prohibition Party



Nominee
Ben Bubar


VP nominee
Earl Dodge





Socialist Party



Nominee
David McReynolds


VP nominee
Diane Drufenbrock





Socialist Workers Party



Nominee
Andrew Pulley
Alternate nominees
Richard Congress
Clifton DeBerry





Workers World Party



Nominee
Deirdre Griswold


VP nominee
Gavrielle Holmes





Independents and other candidates



Lyndon LaRouche
Maureen Smith
Running mate
Elizabeth Cervantes Barron
Warren Spannaus











Other 1980 elections
House
Senate
Gubernatorial









Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 7404989
LCCN: n50021916
ISNI: 0000 0000 8353 9503
GND: 120549891
SUDOC: 027716937
BNF: cb120281947 (data)
US Congress: A000195










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=John_B._Anderson&oldid=791016272"					
Categories: 1922 birthsLiving peopleHarvard Law School alumniUniversity of Illinois at Urbana–Champaign alumniBrandeis University facultyDuke University facultyUniversity of Massachusetts Amherst facultyOregon State University facultyIllinois IndependentsMembers of the Evangelical Free Church of AmericaMembers of the United States House of Representatives from IllinoisPoliticians from Rockford, IllinoisState attorneysAmerican people of Swedish descentUnited States Army soldiersUnited States presidential candidates, 198020th-century American politiciansWorld federalistsAmerican military personnel of World War IIIllinois RepublicansRepublican Party members of the United States House of RepresentativesHidden categories: Pages using citations with accessdate and no URLPages using infobox officeholder with an atypical party valuePages using infobox officeholder with unknown parametersAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from June 2016Wikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2014All articles needing style editingWikipedia articles needing style editing from May 2016Articles with unsourced statements from October 2011Articles with unsourced statements from February 2017Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiersWikipedia articles with LCCN identifiersWikipedia articles with ISNI identifiersWikipedia articles with GND identifiersWikipedia articles with BNF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia CommonsWikiquote 



Languages


CatalàČeštinaDeutschEspañolFrançaisNorsk bokmålPortuguêsРусскийScotsSimple EnglishSuomiSvenskaУкраїнська 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 17 July 2017, at 15:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 











Mask 4 Wood Print by John Anderson






































Today's Featured Artist: Michael Godard
Need your order in time for Christmas?  Check out our Holiday Shipping Deadlines.
Introducing... coffee mugs!
Protect your iPhone 7 with a brand new iPhone 7 phone case!
Introducing the hottest summer accessory of 2016... round beach towels!   FREE WORLDWIDE SHIPPING.
Pixels has expanded to 14 fulfillment centers in 5 countries!
Now shipping framed prints from Canada!   Need your order in time for Christmas?  Check out our Holiday Shipping Deadlines.
Live from New York... it's Anne Geddes!   Watch Anne create one of her iconic holiday images live from her studio in NYC at 10:00 AM EST today.
Need your order in time for Christmas?  Check out our Holiday Shipping Deadlines.
Now shipping framed prints from Australia!   Need your order in time for Christmas?  Check out our Holiday Shipping Deadlines.
Wrap your gifts with a reusable holiday tote bag!   Need your order in time for Christmas?  Check out our Holiday Shipping Deadlines.







PIXELS








Keyword








Keyword
Artist
Keyword + Artist
Title
Title + Artist


Shop
Create
Sell
Community
Help








 






		 
	




Home



Shop
Sell
Discover
Create
Tour
Community
About
Join
Sign In




Back




All Products


Wall Art

Canvas Prints
Framed Prints
Metal Prints
Acrylic Prints
Wood Prints
Prints
Posters



Home Decor

Throw Pillows
Duvet Covers
Shower Curtains
Bath Towels
Hand Towels
Coffee Mugs



Phone Cases

iPhone Cases
Galaxy Cases
Mobile Device Battery Chargers



Lifestyle

Carry-All Pouches
Tote Bags
Weekender Tote Bags
Mobile Device Chargers



Beach

Beach Towels
Beach Sheets
Round Beach Towels
Tote Bags
Weekender Tote Bags



Mens's Apparel

T-Shirts
Premium T-Shirts
V-Neck T-Shirts
Long Sleeve T-Shirts
Baseball T-Shirts
Tank Tops
Hooded Sweatshirts
Tote Bags



Women's Apparel

T-Shirts
V-Neck T-Shirts
Junior T-Shirts
Long Sleeve T-Shirts
Tank Tops
Hooded Sweatshirts
Tote Bags



Toddlers & Babies

Kid's T-Shirts
Toddler T-Shirts
Baby Onesies


Greeting Cards
Tote Bags




Back



Meet the Members
Discussions
Groups
Contests
Events
Who's Online
Join




Back



Artists
Galleries
Buyers




Back



About Us
Contact Us
iOS App
Android App
Shopify App
TV Commercials
Radio Commercials
Satisfaction Guarantee
Take a Tour












 


 


 




Art


Home


Lifestyle


Beach


Tech


Apparel


Collections


Subjects


Our Story



Company History
Staff
Collectors









Sign In



Artists / Photographers
Galleries
Collectors





Join


PixelsPRO







Satisfaction Guarantee
Every purchase includes a 30-day money-back guarantee.   We sell thousands of products each week to buyers from all over the world.   Take a look at these unfiltered reviews!


Where Do We Ship?
We ship all over the world, including the United States.
We have the largest print-on-demand fulfillment network in the world with 15 manufacturing centers in five different countries.
Place your order today, and it will be on its way to you within 2 - 3 business days.


FAQ
You've got questions.   We've got answers.   Visit our frequently asked questions page to view them all.
If you can't find the answers to your question on our FAQ page, please submit a support ticket, and our staff will respond to your question(s) right away.


Give Us a Call
Do you have a question about placing an order?   Give us a call any time:

877-807-5901

We're open 24/7.   
Please note - this number is reserved for buyers with questions about orders.


 










Featured


Spring FlingNEW
Festival FeelsNEW
Heavy MetalNEW
Bring the Outdoors InNEW
The Beach HouseNEW
Frame of MindNEW
The PlayroomNEW
More...





Rooms


Living Room
Kitchen
Master Bedroom
Home Theater
Boy's Bedroom
Girl's Bedroom
Nursery / Baby's Room
More...





House Styles


Beach House
Contemporary
Modern
Rustic Cabin
Southwest
Bachelor Pad
City Condo / Apartment
More...





Hobbies & Interests


Animal Lover
Car Enthusiast
Comic Book Collector
Beer Connoisseur
Movie Buff
Music Lover
Wine Drinker
More...





Professions


Architect
Artist
Chef
Graphic Designer
Mechanic
Scientist
Teacher
More...





Holidays & Occasions


Birthday
Christmas
Easter
Halloween
Independence Day
Thanksgiving
Valentine's Day
More...



							 
						



View All Collections

Close
 















Close
 


Featured Artists


Featured
Painters
Illustrators
Photographers
Digital Artists
View All




Brands


Featured
Entertainment
Publishing
Charity
View All




Collections


Master Bedroom
Bachelor Pad
Southwest Home
Christmas
More...




Lookbooks


Galaxy S7 Cases
Galaxy S6 Cases
Galaxy S5 Cases
Galaxy S4 Cases











Wall Art


Framed Prints
Canvas Prints
Metal Prints
Acrylic Prints
Wood Prints
Art Prints
Posters





Media


Paintings
Photographs
Illustrations / Drawings
Mixed Media





Original Artwork


Originals





Greeting Cards


Greeting Cards





Miscellaneous


Gift Certificates
Create Your Own Products
Sample Kits
Limited Time Promotions



						 
					








Home Decor


Throw Pillows
Duvet Covers
Shower Curtains
Coffee MugsNEW





Bath


Hand Towels
Bath Towels
Bath Sheets
Shower Curtains





Bags


Tote Bags
Weekender Tote Bags





Greeting Cards


Greeting Cards





Miscellaneous


Gift Certificates
Create Your Own Products



						 
					








About Pixels


Our Company
Announcements
Contact Us
FAQ
Satisfaction Guarantee




Videos


TV Commercials
Artist Interviews
Radio Commercials
iPad App Overview




Social


Company Blog
Inside the Industry
Announcements
Facebook
Twitter




Apps


iPhone App
iPad App
Android App
Shopify App
API




Tour


Take a Tour
Membership Plans



							 
						


Close
 









Tour


Take a Tour
Membership Plans




Videos


TV Commercials
Artist Interviews
Radio Commercials
iPad App Overview




Social


Company Blog
Inside the Industry
Announcements
Facebook
Twitter




Apps


iPhone App
iPad App
Android App
Shopify App
API



							 
						


Close
 









About Pixels


About Us
Contact Us
Our Staff
In the Press
FAQ




Social


Company Blog
Announcements
Facebook
Twitter



							 
						








Tote Bags


Tote Bags
Weekender Tote Bags
Carry-All Pouches




Athletics


Yoga MatsNEW
Towels
Men's T-Shirts
Women's T-Shirts




Pouches


Carry-All Pouches




Mugs


Coffee MugsNEW




Tech


iPhone Cases
Galaxy Cases
Portable Battery Chargers



						 
					






Close
 


Beach Towels


Beach TowelsNEW
Beach SheetsNEW
Round Beach TowelsNEW




Tote Bags


Weekender Tote Bags
Tote Bags
Carry-All Pouches




Beach Tech


Portable Battery Chargers









Close
 


Phone Cases


iPhone Cases
Galaxy Cases




Battery Chargers


Portable Battery Chargers for Mobile Devices








Gift guide information will go here.








Abstracts


Abstract Flowers
Abstract Landscapes
Abstract Cityscapes




City Skylines


New York City Skyline
London Skyline
Paris Skyline




Florals


Roses
Sunflowers
Lilies




Food & Beverage


Beer
Wine
Martinis




Animals


Birds
Mammals
Reptiles




Landscapes


Beaches
City Scenes
Mountains
Sunsets




Music


Rock and Roll
Jazz
Musicians




Celebrities


Actors
Musicians
Politicians




Pop Art


Pop Art
Steampunk
Comics




Sports


Athletes
Football
Baseball



							 
						



View All Subjects

Close
 

















Wall Art


Photos-to-ArtNEW
Canvas Prints
Framed Prints
Metal Prints
Acrylic Prints
Wood Prints
Art Prints
Posters
View All





Phone Cases


iPhone Cases
Galaxy Cases





Home Decor


Throw Pillows
Duvet Covers
Shower Curtains





Apparel


T-Shirts
Hooded Sweatshirts
Tank Tops
Youth / Toddler T-Shirts
Baby Onesies
Tote Bags





Greeting Cards


Greeting Cards





Tote Bags


Tote Bags



						 
					






Close
 


Men's Apparel


Men's T-Shirts
Premium T-Shirts
V-Neck T-Shirts
Long Sleeve T-Shirts
Sweatshirts / Hoodies





Women's Apparel


Women's T-Shirts
Women's V-Neck T-Shirts
Tote Bags





Kid's Apparel


Kid's T-Shirts
Toddler T-Shirts
Baby Onesies











Artists & Photographers


Artists & Photographers
Galleries
Today's New Members
Today's New Uploads
Today's New Comments
Join




Community


Discussions
Groups
Contests
Events
Member News
Member Blogs
Chat




Activity


Activity
Graphs
Activity Leaders
Who's Online?



							 
						











Close
 
View All Artists & Photographers










Wall Art


Canvas Prints
Framed Prints
Metal Prints
Acrylic Prints
Wood Prints
Art Prints
Posters
Original Artwork





Art Media


Paintings
Photographs
Drawings
Digital Art
Mixed Media





Home Decor


Throw Pillows
Duvet Covers
Shower Curtains
Hand TowelsNEW
Bath TowelsNEW
Bath SheetsNEW





Lifestyle


Tote Bags
Weekender Tote Bags
Carry-All Pouches
iPhone Cases
Galaxy Cases
Mobile Device ChargersNEW





Beach


Round Beach TowelsNEW
Beach TowelsNEW
Beach SheetsNEW
Weekender Tote BagsNEW
Tote Bags
Carry-All PouchesNEW
Mobile Device ChargersNEW





Tech


iPhone Cases
Galaxy Cases
Travel Chargers





Men's Apparel


T-Shirts
Premium T-Shirts
Slim Fit T-Shirts
V-Neck T-Shirts
Long Sleeve T-Shirts
Sweatshirts / Hoodies





Women's Apparel


Women's T-Shirts
Women's V-Neck T-Shirts
Junior T-Shirts





Women's Apparel


Kid's T-Shirts
Toddler T-Shirts
Baby Onesies





Greeting Cards


Greeting Cards





Miscellaneous


Create Your Own Products
Gift Certificates
Limited Time Promotions



						 
					









Keyword
 


Keyword
Title
Artist
Title + Artist
Keyword + Artist

















Back to John Anderson
|

Shop
 /


Wall Art
 /


Wood Prints
 /


Portraits Wood Prints









PREV|NEXT



The watermark in the lower right corner of the image will not appear on the final print.






0




0




0




0




0
Frame
Top Mat
Bottom Mat
DimensionsImage:7.00" x 10.00"Overall:7.00" x 10.00"

 






PREV
|
NEXT







0






0






0



Share This Page





0




0




0




0




0


Comment:





Like This Image



Add to Favorites


Comment




 


Mask 4 Wood Print



 by John Anderson





$43.60
Show Price Details


ADD TO CART

Add to Favorites



test

Print:Mask 4 by John Anderson - 7.000" x 10.000"$13.00
Material:Wood Print$30.60
Finish:Hanging Wire$0.00
Assembly:Assembly Charge$0.00
Total: $43.60






Wood Print







Canvas Print





Framed Print





Print





Poster





Metal Print





Acrylic Print





 

1. Size



 
7.00"x10.00"
 
8.50"x12.00"
 
9.875"x14.00"
 
11.25"x16.00"
 
14.125"x20.00"
 
16.875"x24.00"
 
21.125"x30.00"
 
25.375"x36.00"
 
28.25"x40.00"
 
33.875"x48.00"




Description

		Mask 4 wood print by John Anderson.   Bring your artwork to life with the texture and added depth of a wood print.   Your image gets printed directly onto a sheet of 3/4" thick maple wood.  There are D-clips on the back of the print for mounting it to your wall using mounting hooks and nails (included).	



Ships Within

			2 - 3 business days		


Ships From

			Atlanta, GA		










Additional Products






View All & Comment





Canvas Print





Framed Print





Print





Poster





Metal Print





Acrylic Print





Wood Print





Greeting Card





Phone Case





Throw Pillow





Duvet Cover





Shower Curtain





Tote Bag





Round Beach Towel





Carry-All Pouch





Bath Towel





Weekender Tote Bag





Portable Battery Charger





Apparel





Mugs






Shop Photographs

Portraits Photographs
People Photographs
Men Photographs



Shop Wood Prints

Portraits Wood Prints
People Wood Prints
Men Wood Prints




Comments (0)
Post a Comment






Add This Artwork to Your Favorites Collection
Comment



There are no comments for Mask 4.   Click here to post the first comment.




Add This Artwork to Your Favorites Collection
Comment




About Wood Prints



Front View

Back View

Bring your artwork to life with the texture and depth of a wood print.   Your image gets printed directly onto a sheet of 3/4" thick maple wood.
All wood prints ship within 3 - 4 business days and arrive "ready to hang" with mounting hooks and nails.
Wood prints are extremely durable and add a rustic feel to any image.
For additional product photos and information, visit our wood prints product page.



About John Anderson



John Anderson







Shop with Confidence




Our return policy is very simple:
 
If you're not happy with a purchase that you made on Pixels.com, for any reason, you can return it to us within 30 days of the order date.   As soon as it arrives, we'll issue a full refund for the entire purchase price.   Please note - Pixels does not reimburse the outgoing or return shipping charges unless the return is due to a defect in quality.
 
Pixels sells thousands of pieces of artwork each month - all with a 100% money-back guarantee.   We take great pride in the fact that hundreds of thousands of artists have chosen Pixels to fulfill their orders, and we look forward to helping you select your next piece!



Have a question about placing an order?

Customer Service: 877-807-5901
(Call Any Time - 24 Hours Per Day)



Delivery
All wood prints ship from our production facility within 2 - 3 business days of your order.




		 
	

$43.60
ADD TO CART





 
Please Wait...





Our Company
About Us
Our Products
Fulfillment Centers
In the Press
Announcements
Buyer Reviews
Blog
White-Label Technology
Wholesale Prints

Art
Wall Art
Paintings
Photographs
Drawings
Digital Art
Mixed Media
Originals




Shop
Wall Art
Home Decor
Tote Bags & Zip Pouches
Phone Cases & Tech Accessories
Beach
Apparel
T-Shirts
Tote Bags
Coffee Mugs
Round Beach Towels


Create
Design Your Own: All Products
Design Your Own: Canvas Prints
Design Your Own: Tote Bags
Design Your Own: Shower Curtains
Print Instagram Photos
Photos-to-Art




PIXELS PRO
Sell Your Art
Membership Plans
iPhone App
iPad App
Android App
Shopify App


Contact
Contact Us
FAQ
Discussion Forum
Return Policy
Returns
Terms of Use
Privacy Policy


Location Settings
Ann Arbor, MI (United States)

Currency: USD ($)
AUD ($)
CAD ($)
EUR (€)
GBP (£)
JPY (¥)
USD ($)



Units: Inches
Inches
Centimeters





Stay Connected
Sign up for our newsletter for exclusive deals, discount codes, and more:








Join



Unsubscribe at any time.









Server Status OK


 


Copyright © 2017 Pixels.com - All Rights Reserved








Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          










Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft



















Amazon.com: anderson john: CDs & Vinyl







 


























Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















CDs & Vinyl



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store       Settings 























































































1-12 of 725 results for CDs & Vinyl : 
"anderson john"


"anderson john" 
                                





                                 Cancel









Sort by 
Relevance
Featured
Price: Low to High
Price: High to Low
Avg. Customer Review
Release Date





























John Anderson:Greatest Hits2009by John Anderson
4.5 out of 5 stars
120
StreamingUnlimitedAudio CD$13.98PrimeGet it by Thursday, Jul 27MP3 Music$9.49Vinylfrom $258.72
eligibleFREE Shipping on eligible ordersOther Formats:Audio Cassette
New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $4.95,Vinylfrom $258.72,Audio Cassettefrom $2.25

Super Hits: John Anderson2006 | CDby John Anderson
4.8 out of 5 stars
42
StreamingUnlimitedAudio CD$5.99PrimeGet it by Thursday, Jul 27MP3 Music$5.99Audio Cassette$29.84PrimeOnly 1 left
eligibleFREE Shipping on eligible orders
New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $3.96,Audio Cassettefrom $10.09

Goldmine2015by John Anderson
4.9 out of 5 stars
66
StreamingUnlimitedAudio CD$9.99PrimeGet it by Tomorrow, Jul 26MP3 Music$8.99
eligibleFREE Shipping on eligible orders
New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $5.47

John Anderson2007by John Anderson
4.7 out of 5 stars
3
StreamingUnlimitedAudio CDfrom $69.00MP3 Music$9.49Vinylfrom $8.00

New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $69.00,Vinylfrom $8.00











Seminole Wind / Solid Ground2012 | Importby John Anderson
5 out of 5 stars
6
Audio CD$9.19PrimeUsually ships in 1 to 3 weeks
FREE Shipping on eligible orders
New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $6.20

Country Legends2009 | CDby John Anderson
5 out of 5 stars
5
StreamingUnlimitedAudio CD$4.35Add-on ItemOnly 10 leftMP3 Music$8.99
eligibleFREE Shipping on eligible orders
New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $1.99

Anthology2002 | CDby John Anderson
4.3 out of 5 stars
49
Audio CDfrom $32.99

New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $32.99

John Anderson (The Encore Collection)1997 | CDby John Anderson
5 out of 5 stars
2
Audio CD$9.10Only 1 leftAudio Cassettefrom $4.48

New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $1.42,Audio Cassettefrom $4.48

John Anderson: Ultimate Hits2004 | CDby John Anderson
3.6 out of 5 stars
12
Audio CDfrom $18.21

New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $18.21

Country Classics2009 | CDby John Anderson
4.8 out of 5 stars
5
Audio CD$5.99PrimeOnly 6 left
FREE Shipping on eligible ordersSeminole Wind2009by John Anderson
4.6 out of 5 stars
33
Audio CD$11.98PrimeGet it by Thursday, Jul 27Audio Cassette$18.84PrimeOnly 1 left
FREE Shipping on eligible orders
New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $0.31,Audio Cassettefrom $2.94

Paradise1996by John Anderson
5 out of 5 stars
3
StreamingUnlimitedAudio CD$5.98PrimeOnly 1 leftMP3 Music$9.90Audio Cassettefrom $1.64
FREE Shipping on eligible orders
New and Used:
Audio CDfrom $1.37,Audio Cassettefrom $1.64














 
Previous Page
1
2
3
...
61
 
Next Page
















Sponsored Links
(What's this?)








Ad feedback











Search FeedbackDid you find what you were looking for?YesNo
Choose a category that best describes the issue that you are having with the search:Choose a category…I need to talk to customer service.I still haven't found what I'm looking for.How do I filter or sort my search ?Something is broken.A picture or description looks wrong.Could you add a feature ?Could you start carrying a product not listed here ?Choose a category…







Leave us some comments about your search; your comments can help make our site better for everyone.Submit

Get Express customer service or contact us by e-mail or phone.contact us

Thank you for your feedback.
If you need help or have a question for Customer Service, please visit the Help Section.
















Show results for
                                Any CategoryCDs & VinylCountryToday's CountryRoadhouse CountryOutlaw CountryNeotraditional CountryClassicalVocal PopOpera & Classical VocalPopRockHoliday & WeddingSoundtracksChildren's MusicAlternative RockBluesBroadway & VocalistsChristianClassic RockDance & ElectronicFolkGospelJazzKaraokeLatin MusicMetalNew AgeR&BRap & Hip-HopSpecial InterestWorld MusicSee moreRefine byAutoRip
(What's this?)

Delivery DayGet It by TomorrowAmazon PrimeEligible for Free ShippingFree Shipping by AmazonNew ReleasesLast 30 daysLast 90 daysComing SoonMusic ArtistJohn AndersonEmmylou HarrisBrian WilsonLeroy AndersonJohn ConleePaul McCartneyVince GillJon AndersonRonnie MilsapIan AndersonWillie NelsonConway TwittyPyotr Ilyich TchaikovskyGary MorrisEddie RabbittSee moreMusic FormatCDCassetteVinylParental AdvisoryExclude Explicit LyricsCD & Vinyl EditionCompilationsDouble AlbumsImportsSingles & EPsLive AlbumsBox SetsLimited EditionsClassical Music PeriodEarly MusicRenaissance (c.1450-1600)Baroque (c.1600-1750)Classical (c.1770-1830)Romantic (c.1820-1910)Modern, 20th, & 21st CenturyPackaging OptionFrustration-Free PackagingAvg. Customer Review4 Stars & Up & Up3 Stars & Up & Up2 Stars & Up & Up1 Star & Up & UpInternational ShippingAmazonGlobal EligibleConditionCollectibleNewUsedAvailabilityInclude Out of Stock












































































There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started















































        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.






        Your recently viewed items and featured recommendations
    



 › 
View or edit your browsing history

After viewing product detail pages, look here to find an easy way to navigate back to pages you are interested in.








Back to top
Get to Know UsCareersAbout AmazonInvestor RelationsAmazon DevicesMake Money with UsSell on AmazonSell Your Services on AmazonSell on Amazon BusinessSell Your Apps on AmazonBecome an AffiliateAdvertise Your ProductsSelf-Publish with UsBecome an Amazon VendorSell Your Subscription on Amazon›See allAmazon Payment ProductsAmazon Rewards Visa Signature CardsAmazon.com Store CardAmazon.com Corporate Credit LineShop with PointsCredit Card MarketplaceReload Your BalanceAmazon Currency ConverterLet Us Help YouYour AccountYour OrdersShipping Rates & PoliciesAmazon PrimeReturns & ReplacementsManage Your Content and DevicesAmazon AssistantHelp




English



United States




Amazon Music Stream millions of songs

Amazon Drive Cloud storage from Amazon

6pm Score deals on fashion brands

AbeBooks Books, art & collectibles

ACX  Audiobook Publishing Made Easy

Alexa Actionable Analytics for the Web

Amazon Business Everything For Your Business

 

AmazonFresh Groceries & More Right To Your Door

AmazonGlobal Ship Orders Internationally

Home Services Handpicked Pros Happiness Guarantee

Amazon Inspire Digital Educational  Resources

Amazon Rapids Fun stories for  kids on the go

Amazon Restaurants Food delivery from local restaurants

Amazon Video Direct Video Distribution Made Easy

 

Amazon Web Services Scalable Cloud Computing Services

Audible Download Audio Books

AudiobookStand Discount Audiobooks on Disc

Book Depository Books With Free Delivery Worldwide

Box Office Mojo Find Movie Box Office Data

ComiXology Thousands of Digital Comics

CreateSpace Indie Print Publishing Made Easy

 

DPReview Digital Photography

East Dane Designer Men's Fashion

Fabric Sewing, Quilting & Knitting

Goodreads Book reviews & recommendations

IMDb Movies, TV & Celebrities

IMDbPro Get Info Entertainment Professionals Need

Junglee.com Shop Online in India

 

Kindle Direct Publishing Indie Digital Publishing Made Easy


Prime Now FREE 2-Hour Delivery on Everyday Items

Prime Photos Unlimited Photo Storage Free With Prime

Shopbop Designer Fashion Brands

TenMarks.com Math Activities for Kids & Schools

Warehouse Deals Open-Box Discounts

Whispercast Discover & Distribute Digital Content


 

 

Withoutabox Submit to Film Festivals

Woot! Deals and  Shenanigans

Zappos Shoes & Clothing

Souq.com Shop Online in the Middle East

Subscribe with Amazon Discover & try subscription services

 


Conditions of UsePrivacy NoticeInterest-Based Ads© 1996-2017, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates














Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          











Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          


















Amazon.com: Amazon Music Unlimited








































Interesting Finds Updated Daily










Amazon




    Try Prime
  


















Digital Music



All Departments
Alexa Skills
Amazon Devices
Amazon Video
Amazon Warehouse Deals
Appliances
Apps & Games
Arts, Crafts & Sewing
Automotive Parts & Accessories
Baby
Beauty & Personal Care
Books
CDs & Vinyl
Cell Phones & Accessories
Clothing, Shoes & Jewelry
   Women
   Men
   Girls
   Boys
   Baby
Collectibles & Fine Art
Computers
Courses
Credit and Payment Cards
Digital Music
Electronics
Gift Cards
Grocery & Gourmet Food
Handmade
Health, Household & Baby Care
Home & Business Services
Home & Kitchen
Industrial & Scientific
Kindle Store
Luggage & Travel Gear
Luxury Beauty
Magazine Subscriptions
Movies & TV
Musical Instruments
Office Products
Patio, Lawn & Garden
Pet Supplies
Prime Exclusive
Prime Pantry
Software
Sports & Outdoors
Tools & Home Improvement
Toys & Games
Vehicles
Video Games
Wine





Go

















Departments









EN

 
      




Hello. Sign inAccount & ListsSign inAccount & ListsOrdersTry PrimeCart0






Your Amazon.comToday's DealsGift Cards & RegistrySellHelpDisability Customer Support 






 Amazon Music Unlimited Prime Music CDs & Vinyl Download Store         Open Web Player MP3 cart Settings













































































































$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          




$7.99/mo for Prime members




Non-Prime price: $9.99/month



Change or cancel anytime




            Start your 30-day free trial
          
















Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.




Any song, anywhere




Tens of millions of songs with new releases from today's most popular artists. Listen ad-free with unlimited skips. Download for offline listening.
















Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).




Already using Prime Music?




Upgrade to Amazon Music Unlimited now to unlock tens of millions of songs, including the hottest new releases. Only $7.99/month or $79/year (12 months for the price of 10).
















Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More




Better with Echo - Just ask




Play your favorite music with innovative Alexa voice controls, exclusive to Amazon Music.




Want Amazon Music Unlimited just on your Echo? Learn More


























Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          




Choose the right Amazon Music plan for you




Learn More




Learn More




Learn More




Questions? See our FAQ.





            Start free trial
          

















There's a problem loading this menu right now.
Learn more about Amazon Prime.






 Get fast, free shipping with Amazon Prime 
 Prime members enjoy FREE Two-Day Shipping and exclusive access to music, movies, TV shows, original audio series, and Kindle books. 

      >
      Get started

















v




























Robot Check













Enter the characters you see below
Sorry, we just need to make sure you're not a robot. For best results, please make sure your browser is accepting cookies.










Type the characters you see in this image:








Try different image











Continue shopping











Conditions of Use




Privacy Policy


          © 1996-2014, Amazon.com, Inc. or its affiliates
          







